 “Currently, we have four-month-old mice that used to be diabetic and are no longer diabetic,” he added.
 The research is still in its early stages, as Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor in the Faculty of Medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and director of the Canadian Diabetes Association's clinical and scientific department, points out.
 Like other experts, he is skeptical about whether diabetes can be cured and points out that these findings are not relevant to those who already suffer from type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, permanent secretary of the Swedish Academy's Nobel Committee, publicly stated on Sveriges Radio in Sweden that, unable to contact Bob Dylan directly to inform him of the 2016 Literature Prize, the committee had abandoned its efforts to reach him.
 Danius said: “We are not doing anything at the moment. I called and emailed his closest assistant and received very cordial replies. For the time being, that is certainly enough.”
 Earlier, Ring's chief executive, Jamie Siminoff, mentioned that the company had started because the doorbell of his entrance could not be heard from the store he had mounted in his garage.
 He said he built a wifi bell.
 Siminoff said sales skyrocketed after her appearance on Shark Tank in 2013, when the show’s panel of investors declined to fund the company.
 Toward the end of 2017, Siminoff made an appearance on the television shopping channel QVC.
 Ring also reached a settlement in the litigation with the competing security company, ADT Corporation.
 To date, no drug has been proven to be effective in treating the existing infection caused by Ebola, although there is an experimental vaccine that appears to be able to reduce the mortality caused by the disease.
 ZMapp, an antibody cocktail, had promising early field results, but formal studies showed it was less beneficial than expected at preventing death.
 In the PALM trial, the function of Zmapp was control, that is, the scientists used it as a basis and compared it with the other three treatments.
 USA Gymnastics supports the United States Olympic Committee’s statement and recognizes that it is imperative that the Olympic family foster a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC statement that the interests of athletes, clubs and their sports can be best served by moving forward with meaningful change within our organization, rather than withdrawing certifications.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that can shed light on how the abuse that Larry Nassar's survivors so bravely described could have gone on for so long without being seen and accepts any necessary and appropriate changes.
 The goal of USA Gymnastics and USOC is the same: to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for athletes to pursue their dreams in a protected, positive and enhanced environment.
 During the 1960s, Brzezinski worked for John F. Kennedy as an adviser and later for the government of Lyndon B. Johnson.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy in the 1976 elections, and later served as National Security Advisor (NSA) from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As National Security Advisor, he assisted Carter in the diplomatic handling of international affairs, such as the 1978 Camp David Accords, the normalization of relations between the United States and China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution of 1979, which led to a hostage crisis in Iran, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, was nominated in all the most important categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress, respectively.
 Other nominations include Best Picture, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Costume Design, Best Film Editing, Best Original Score, Best Production Design, Best Sound Editing, Best Sound Mixing and Best Original Screenplay.
 There were two nominees for Best Original Song: Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars. Lionsgate was nominated 26 times, more than any other studio.
 On Sunday night, in a statement made through the press secretary, the President of the United States of America, Donald Trump, announced that the US troops would withdraw from Syria.
 The announcement came after Trump spoke by phone with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would also assume the surveillance of ISIS militants who were captured, whom European nations, according to the statement, denied their repatriation.
 In addition to confirming that at least some dinosaurs were feathered, a theory already widely accepted, it also offers specific data that fossils generally do not offer, such as their color and three-dimensional structure.
 According to experts, this animal has a brown plumage in the upper part and a pale or carotenoid tone in the lower part.
 The discovery also helps to better understand the evolution of bird feathers.
 Since the plumage of dinosaurs does not have a well-developed axis, called the rachis, but does have other features of feathers (barbs and barbules), the researchers concluded that the rachis is likely the result of an evolutionary development of these other features.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that their function was not related to flight, but rather to regulate temperature or as an indicator of it. The researchers maintain that, although it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample analyzed has features of the plumage of an adult and not of a chick.
 The experts' assessments were that, although it is the tail of a short-lived dinosaur, the sample illustrates more the plumage of an adult than that of a chick.
 In the morning of yesterday, in Gaziantep, Turkey, a car bomb killed two police officers and injured more than twenty others.
 The government said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 Police said the suspect in the attack is a suspected Daesh militant.
 It was discovered that the sun was governed by the same basic principles as other stars: the only factors driving its activity within the system were its luminosity and its rotation.
 The light intensity and rotation are combined to calculate the Rossby number of a star, which is linked to the plasma flow.
 The lower the Rossby number, the less active the star is in relation to its magnetic reversals.
 Iwasaki faced numerous problems during his voyage.
 He was attacked by pirates, bitten by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped from marriage in Nepal and was stopped by the police in India.
 The 802.11n standard works on both 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz frequencies.
 This will enable backward compatibility with earlier versions of 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided the base station has dual radios.
 The speeds of the 802.11n standard are much higher than those achieved by its predecessors, with a theoretical maximum throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, who is married and has two grown children, did not make a good impression on Miller, who was the one to whom he told the story.
 When asked for a comment, Miller said, "Mike talks a lot during the hearing... I was preparing, so I really couldn't hear what he was saying."
 "We will work hard to reduce the carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by 2020, so that the difference will be significant compared with 2005," Hu said.
 He did not mention a figure for the cuts and said they would be based on China's economic output.
 Hu encouraged developing states to “not return to the traditional path of polluting first and cleaning up later.”
 He added: “It is not right to demand that they assume obligations that exceed their stage of development, their level of responsibility and their capabilities.”
 The Iraq Study Group released its report at 12:00 GMT.
 He warns that no one can guarantee that any Iraqi action at this point will halt sectarian fighting, growing violence or a slide toward chaos.
 The report begins with a call for open debate and consensus in the United States about Middle East policies.
 The report is highly critical of virtually every aspect of the current policy of the executive power in Iraq, and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 It contains 78 recommendations, the first of which is the adoption of a new initiative before the end of the year with the purpose of protecting the borders of Iraq from hostile operations and to restore diplomatic ties with its neighbors.
 Cristina Fernández de Kirchner, who is currently a senator and is the first lady of Argentina, announced last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers (31 miles) south of Buenos Aires, that she will run for president.
 The Argentine Theater was the place where Mrs. Kirchner announced her intention to run for president; this is the same place where she began her campaign for the Senate in 2005, representing the province of Buenos Aires.
 The issue that sparked the debate was the controversy over the budget allocated to relief and reconstruction after Hurricane Katrina, a measure that some fiscal conservatives jokingly labeled the "Bush New Orleans Agreement."
 Liberal criticism of the restoration work focuses on the fact that reconstruction contracts have been awarded to people who appear to be Washington officials.
 More than four million individuals gathered in Rome to witness the funeral.
 So many people gathered that not everyone could get into the funeral at St. Peter's Square.
 Large television screens were set up in different parts of Rome so that everyone could watch the ceremony.
 In many other Italian cities, as well as around the world, in particular in Poland, similar setups were carried out that saw many people.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policies of concentrating its resources on easy-to-solve cases, especially car thefts, in order to improve its success rate.
 In fiscal year 2005, Congress began funding the campaign against obscenity and gave the FBI the instruction to assign 10 agents to deal with adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest in the innings: 70 runs with only 41 balls, hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The performance of both Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, middle order batsmen, was good and they put up a hundred-run partnership.
 However, after losing the captain's wicket, India only managed 36 runs and 7 of their wickets were knocked down to finish the overs.
 U.S. President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore early on November 16, kicking off a seven-day tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng, and discussed trade and terrorism issues with the head of state, Lee Hsien Loong.
 After a week of midterm election defeats, Bush gave a speech to the audience about commercial expansion in the Asian continent.
 Stephen Harper, prime minister, agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee where all parties participate before second reading, and after a 25-minute meeting at the PMO on Tuesday with NDP leader Jack Layton.
 During the meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton had requested that changes be made to the Conservatives' environmental law, appealing to a "comprehensive and thorough revision of its wording".
 Since the federal government intervened and assumed the financing of the Mersey hospital, in Davenport, Tasmania, state authorities and some members of the federal parliament have called such a measure deceptive, with an eye to the federal elections, which will take place in November.
 However, Prime Minister John Howard said the only purpose of the law was to protect the hospital from degradation by the Tasmanian government, by giving it an additional A$45 million.
 According to the latest report, sea level readings indicate the formation of a tsunami and some activity of this phenomenon was detected in the vicinity of Pago Pago and Niue.
 No major damage or injuries have been reported in Tonga, but power was temporarily disrupted, which is believed to have prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the tsunami warning issued by the PTWC.
 Fourteen schools on the Big Island or in the vicinity closed completely on Wednesday, despite the warnings being lifted.
 George W. Bush, president of the United States, welcomed the announcement.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe called the North Korean commitment "an important step toward the goal of achieving verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula."
 Today, the tenth storm of its hurricane season was named, which was named Subtropical Storm Jerry.
 The National Hurricane Center (NHC) said it was now expected that Jerry would make landfall.
 According to estimates by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, up to 6 inches of rain could seep through the previously damaged dikes.
 Due to the overflow of the dam that is near the Ninth Ward, water is currently up to the waist in that area, which had already suffered flooding of up to 20 feet due to Hurricane Katrina.
 The water flows over the dam in a stretch that is 100 feet wide.
 Adam Cuerden, Commons administrator, expressed his frustration with the deletions in a statement he made to Wikinwes last month.
 “Essentially, he [Wales] lied to us from the beginning, on the one hand pretending that he was doing it for legal reasons, and on the other hand pretending to pay attention to us until the moment he removed the artistic content.”
 The community's outrage led to current efforts to draft a policy on the site's sexual content, which hosts millions of open-license media.
 Although it was an eminently theoretical work, the program was drafted with the purpose of simulating the observations made to the Sagittarius galaxy.
 It would be the tidal forces between the dark matter in the galaxy and the Milky Way that would cause the effect expected by the group of scientists.
 The Milky Way influences the Sagittarius galaxy in the same way that the moon exerts a gravitational pull on our planet and causes tides.
 The experts concluded that dark matter interacts with itself in the same way that regular matter does.
 This theory holds that most of the dark matter that surrounds a galaxy is located in a halo around it and consists of numerous small particles.
 On television coverage can be seen white smoke emanating from the plant.
 The local government warns those who live near the plant not to leave their homes, keep air conditioners off and not to drink tap water.
 According to Japan's nuclear agency, radioactive cesium and iodine have been found in the plant.
 According to speculations of the authorities, everything indicates that the containers of the place that have fuel of uranium could have broken and have losses.
 Extremely drug-resistant tuberculosis (XDR-TB) was first detected by Dr. Tony Moll in the South African area of Zululandia.
 During an interview, he said that the new variant was generating "much concern and alarm, given its high mortality rate".
 Dr. Moll believes that some patients may have contracted the virus inside the hospital and that at least two of the infected were health workers at that hospital.
 In one year, an infected person can infect between 10 and 15 people with whom he has had close contact.
 Still, the percentage of XDR-TB in the total TB patient group appears to be low: 6000 out of a total of 333 000 individuals infected at a particular time in South Africa.
 The satellites, which weighed more than 1,000 pounds and traveled at about 17,500 miles per hour, collided 491 miles above Earth.
 According to experts, the explosion that generated the collision was massive.
 They are still trying to establish how important the impact was and how it will affect the planet.
 The U.S. Strategic Command, which is part of the Defense Department, is tracking the debris.
 The results of the tracking analysis will be made available on a free-access website.
 Ohio authorities said a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with aggravated murder after his mother's body was found in the trunk of his car on Wednesday.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the ground beside the road, wearing a T-shirt and underwear, and apparently in an overdose state.
 He guided the officers to his black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, covered with blood-stained blankets.
 Police said the body appeared to have been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease during this season were recorded in late July.
 Pigs are the carriers of the disease, which then migrates to humans through mosquitoes.
 The outbreak has led the Indian authorities to take measures such as the deployment of pig hunters, the distribution of thousands of mosquito nets to the population and the use of pesticides in the most affected areas.
 The authorities have also guaranteed several million doses of the vaccine to fight encephalitis, which will allow health companies to prepare for next year.
 This year, the scarcity of monetary resources and the low priority, compared to other diseases, have caused delays in the implementation of the vaccine delivery plans in the historically most vulnerable regions.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where, after three years, he got a job at the Swedish Post Office and there he became Chief engraver.
 The number of stamps he has produced, both for Sweden and for 28 other nations, exceeds 1,000 units.
 The quality and level of detail of his work is so recognized that he has become one of the few "household names" among philatelists, with people specializing in collecting his work.
 Included in the Guinness Book of World Records, his thousandth stamp was the formidable «Memorable feats of the Swedish kings» (David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, year 2000).
 In addition, he had a hand in the engraving of banknotes for many states, the most recent examples of his work being the portraits of the Prime Minister visible on the obverse of the new $5 and $100 Canadian banknotes.
 After the accident, Gibson was taken to a hospital, but died shortly after.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was uninjured in the accident.
 The vehicle was removed from the scene of the accident around 12:00 GMT on the same day.
 An employee of a garage near the scene of the accident said: "There were children waiting to cross the street, and they were all screaming and crying."
 Everyone ran back from the scene of the accident.
 Other topics on the agenda in Bali are saving the forests that remain on the planet and sharing technologies to help developing nations grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN intends to complete a fund for assistance to countries affected by the effects of global warming, in order to be able to face its impact.
 Funds could be allocated to non-flooded homes, better water management and crop diversification.
 Fluke wrote that efforts by some to silence women who speak out about the health of these have not succeeded.
 This was based on the large number of positive and encouraging comments from women and men urging that contraceptive medicines be considered a health need.
 After the fighting had ceased, and the wounded had been taken to the hospital, about 40 of the remaining prisoners remained in the yard, refusing to go to their cells.
 Although negotiators tried to defuse the situation, the prisoners' demands are confusing.
 The inmates set fire to the prison yard between 10:00 and 11:00 p.m. MDT.
 Quickly, agents armed with riot gear entered the yard and shot down the prisoners with tear gas.
 Firefighters were able to extinguish the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 With the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal flooding that left sediments along the river was stopped.
 This sediment was necessary for the formation of sand banks and beaches, which, in turn, functioned as habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two species of fish have become extinct and two others are in danger of extinction, including the gila cypha.
 While the water level will only rise a few feet past the flood, officials expect it to reach to replenish the eroded sandbanks downriver.
 No tsunami alert has been issued or will be issued because, according to the geophysical agency of Yakarta, the earthquake did not reach the magnitude of 6.5 required for such purpose.
 Although there was no threat of a tsunami, residents began to panic and leave their businesses and homes.
 While Winfrey cried at her farewell, she assured her fans that she would be back.
 «This will not be a farewell; it is only the end of a chapter and the beginning of a new one».
 The comfortable re-election of the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, was confirmed by the final results of the Namibian parliamentary and presidential elections.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organization (SWAPO), also won the majority of votes in the legislative elections.
 Coalition and Afghan troops have moved into the area to secure the site and additional coalition aircraft have been sent to assist.
 The accident took place high up in mountainous terrain and is believed to have been caused by hostile fire.
 Efforts to find the crash site must contend with bad weather and rugged terrain.
 The charity association of medicine Mangola, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization classify it as the worst outbreak recorded in the country.
 The spokesman for Medecines Sans Frontiere, Richard Veerman, said: "Angola is heading for the worst outbreak it has ever faced and the situation remains very serious."
 The games started at 10:00 a.m., accompanied by good weather, and, except for a light rain in the middle of the morning that soon dissipated, it was an ideal day for rugby 7.
 South Africa, the best seeded team in the tournament, started well by winning 26-0 against Zambia, who are ranked fifth.
 Although they were subdued against their southern sisters, South Africa improved as the tournament progressed.
 Their disciplined defense, ball handling skills and excellent teamwork led them to stand out and it was clear that this was the team to beat.
 The authorities of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank Museum maintain that a fungus has infected the tree and that it is dangerous to public health because it is at risk of falling.
 His felling was scheduled for Tuesday, but was saved after an emergency court ruling.
 The diameter of all the entrances to the cave, known as the "Seven Sisters", is at least 100 m to 250 m (328 to 820 feet).
 As the infrared images show, the temperature variations during the day and night indicate that they are probably caves.
 During the day, its temperature is lower than that of the surrounding surface and, at night, higher.
 "While its thermal behavior is not as regular as the large caves on our planet, which tend to maintain a fairly stable temperature, it is consistent with these deep cavities in the ground," said Glen Cushing, of the archaeology team of the US Geological Survey (USGS) and Northern Arizona University, in Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, elections have traditionally been a low-tech affair: voters withdraw to a booth and insert a pre-printed ballot into an envelope indicating the candidate they have chosen.
 After the officials verify the identity of the voter, he or she places the ballot in the ballot box and signs the list of voters.
 French electoral law establishes the procedures quite strictly.
 Since 1988, the ballot boxes have to be transparent, which allows voters and observers to verify that there are no surpluses at the beginning of the vote and that no others are added than those of those who vote, duly counted and authorized.
 The candidates have the right to send representatives to monitor each stage of the process and, during the night, the volunteers count the votes under strict supervision and in accordance with specific procedures.
 ASUS Eee PC, which was previously launched globally for its cost-saving and functionality advantages, became the subject of heated discussions at the Taipei 2007 Information Technology Month.
 But the market for laptop consumers was drastically versified and changed after ASUS received from the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China the Taiwan Sustainable Development Award 2007.
 The station's website describes the show as "an old-school radio drama with a smart, new and offensive twist!"
 In its early days, the program was only broadcast on the internet radio site, TogiNet Radio, a long-standing space focused on the spoken radio format.
 In late 2015, TogiNet installed the AstroNet Radio station as a branch.
 Originally, the show featured amateur voice actors from the East Texas area.
 It was reported that the widespread looting continued throughout the night, as there was no police presence on the streets of Bishkek.
 One observer described Bishkek as sinking into a state of “anarchy” as groups of people wandered the streets and looted shops selling consumer goods.
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the southern protesters for the unrest.
 South Africa defeated the All Blacks of New Zealand in a rugby match of the Tri Nations, at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium, in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was a one-point win, 21 to 20, ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 For the Springboks, it meant overcoming a run of five consecutive defeats.
 It was the last match for the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final match of the series will be played at Ellis Park, Johannesburg, next week, in a clash between the Springboks and Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook western Montana at 10:08 p.m. Monday.
 Neither the U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) nor its National Earthquake Information Center has reported any direct damage.
 The earthquake's epicenter was located about 20 km (15 mi) northeast of Dillon and almost 65 km (40 mi) south of Butte.
 They confirmed that the deadly strain of bird flu in humans, H5N1, attacked a wild duck that died, which was found on Monday in a pond near Lyon, in eastern France.
 France is in seventh place among the European Union members affected by the virus, behind Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Suspected cases of H5N5 have not yet been confirmed in Croatia and Denmark.
 Chambers's claim against God was based on "death and destruction and terror of millions and millions of people on the planet."
 Chambers, an agnostic, claims that his claim "has no merit" and that "anyone can sue anyone".
 The story told by the French opera presented by Camille Saint-Saens is that of an artist «whose life is prescribed by love, drugs and Japan».
 As a result, artists smoke cannabis cigarettes on stage and the show encourages the audience to do the same.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Governor Rick Perry and Rep. Michele Bachmann, R-Minn., were fourth, fifth and sixth, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but launched harsh words against Rommey, whose campaign ads were broadcast in Iowa.
 Perry said: "I will be going back to Texas to evaluate the results of today's election and determine whether there is a path forward for me to continue in the race." He then said he would remain in the race and compete in the January 21 primary in South Carolina.
 Bachmann, who won the Ames Straw Poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 According to reports, he was in his twenties. Bieber said in a statement: "While I was not present nor directly involved in this terrible accident, my thoughts and prayers are with the victim's family."
 According to the entertainment news website TMZ, the photographer stopped the vehicle on the opposite side of Sepulveda Boulevard and attempted to take photographs of the police stop before crossing the street and continuing, which caused the California Highway Patrol officer conducting the vehicle stop to twice order him to return to the other side of the street.
 According to police officials, it is unlikely that the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will be prosecuted.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, several countries have not managed to reach the podium of medals.
 They are the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen, who yesterday took ninth place in the women's Super-G, and Finland, with Katjia Saarinen in tenth place in the same event.
 Mitchell Gourley of Australia placed 11th in the men's standing super-G, while Czech competitor Oldrich Jelinek finished 16th in the men's sitting.
 Arly Velásquez of Mexico placed 15th in the men's Super-G sitting. Adam Hall of New Zealand finished ninth in the men's Super-G sitting.
 The male visually impaired skier, Maciej Krezel, and his guide, Anna Ogarzynska, from Poland, finished in 13th place in the Super-G. Jong Seork Park of South Korea placed 24th in the men's sitting group.
 After the earthquake in 2010, UN peacekeepers arrived in Haiti and are blamed for spreading the disease, as the first cases were recorded near their troops' camp.
 According to the demand, the waste from the UN camp was not properly sanitized, which caused the bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of the most powerful rivers in Haiti.
 Prior to the arrival of peacekeepers, Haiti had not faced disease-related problems since the 19th century.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti has mentioned the existence of independent tests that point to the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion as the one that unintentionally introduced the disease to Haiti.
 According to Danielle Lantagne, a disease expert working for the UN, it is likely that the outbreak was caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that Howard University Hospital admitted the patient and that his condition was stable.
 The patient had been in Nigeria, where there were some cases of Ebola.
 The hospital has followed infection control protocols, including keeping the patient away from others to prevent possible infections.
 Prior to The Simpsons, Simon had held several jobs in other television shows, in various positions.
 In the 80s, he lent his collaboration in several programs, for example, Taxi, Cheers and The Tracy Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he helped create The Simpsons with Brooks and Groening, and was responsible for hiring the show's first writing staff.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars in royalties season after season.
 Earlier, China's official news agency Xinhua reported the hijacking of an aircraft.
 According to subsequent reports, the aircraft received a bomb threat and was diverted back to Afghanistan, where it landed in Kandahar.
 Preliminary reports indicate that the aircraft was diverted back to Afghanistan after being denied permission to make an emergency landing in Urumchi.
 Airplane accidents are common in Iran, which has an old fleet that does not receive good maintenance, either for civilian or military operations.
 International sanctions have resulted in the inability to acquire new aircraft.
 Three people died and three others were injured in a police helicopter crash earlier this week.
 Last month, Iran experienced one of its worst air disasters in years when a passenger plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing all 168 passengers on board.
 The same month, another passenger plane overshot a runway in Mashhad and crashed into a wall, killing 17.
 Aerosmith canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The rock band was scheduled to tour the U.S. and Canada, which would end on September 16.
 The reason for the cancellation of the tour was the injury that suffered the singer Steven Tyler when he fell from the stage during one of his presentations on August 5.
 After both players held all the service games of the set, Murray lost the first one by sudden death.
 While Del Potro held an early lead in the second set, this too was subject to a tie-break after reaching 6-6.
 At that point in the match, Del Potro had to receive treatment on his shoulder, but managed to return to the game.
 The program began at 8:30 p.m. local time (15:00 UTC).
 Renowned national singers sang bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 Singer Sanju Sharma inaugurated the event and was followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. He also performed the chhappan bhog bhajan, along with singer Raju Khandelwal.
 After that, Lakkha Singh took over to sing the bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was honored with 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog which, in Hindu religion, consists of 56 different edible items, such as sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, among others, that are served as an offering to the god.
 In addition, Lakkha Singh performed the chhappan bhog bhajan along with the singer Raju Khandekwak.
 On Thursday, at the opening presentation of the Tokyo Game Show, Satoru Iwata, president of Nintento, unveiled the design of the controller for the new Nintendo Revolution console launched by the company.
 Similar to a remote control for a television, this control is provided with two sensors located near the user's television, enabling the triangulation of its position in a three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in video games, through the movement of the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of the car and retired shortly after the start.
 Fernando Alonso, his teammate, had the lead for most of the race, but had to put an end to it just after his pit stop, surely because his right rear wheel was seriously bent.
 Michael Schumacher retired from the race shortly after Alonso, due to a suspension failure, the result of numerous battles during the race.
 According to a transcript of the press conference, he said, "She was very beautiful and, in addition, she sang quite well."
 Every time we did a rehearsal of this, it moved me to the very depths of my soul.
 Approximately 3 minutes after takeoff, a camera inside the aircraft showed numerous pieces of insulating foam falling off the fuel tank.
 However, it is believed that they have not caused any damage to the shuttle.
 N. Wayne Hale Jr., in charge of the NASA shuttle program, said the foam had fallen "after the time we are concerned about."
 Five minutes after the show began, a wind began to blow, which, about a minute later, had reached 70 kilometers per hour (...) then came the rain, but so strong and so dense that it pierced your skin like a needle. Then hail fell from the sky; people, terrified, screamed and ran over others.
 "I lost my sister and her friend, and on the way back I saw two people in wheelchairs and the others were jumping over them and pushing them," Armand Versace said.
 In addition, NHK said that the Kashiwazaki-Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co said the quake caused no incidents and that reactors 1 and 2 at its Shika nuclear plant were shut down.
 About 9,400 homes in the region are reported to be without water and some 100 without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged, train service was disrupted in the affected areas, and Noto Airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb was detonated at the door of the governor general's office.
 Three other bombs were detonated in the vicinity of government establishments in a two-hour span.
 While there are reports that the official death toll is eight and the authorities have confirmed that nearly 30 people were injured, the official figures are still unknown.
 Concentrations of cyanuric acid and melamine were found in urine samples from animals that died after eating contaminated pet food.
 The researchers indicated that the two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can obstruct kidney function.
 Experts detected the formation of crystals in the urine of cats, due to the incorporation of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 When compared through the use of infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), it was determined that the composition of the crystals coincides with that found in the urine of affected pets.
 I don't know if you've noticed or not, but most of the products coming from Central America were arriving in this country free of taxes.
 Yet, the countries of Central America taxed eighty percent of the products we made for them. We treated them.
 I thought that was not right; it was definitely not fair.
 All I say to people is that you treat us the same way we treat you.
 A bill was proposed by the governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, which does not allow the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 The bill requires violent video games sold in California to be labeled with a sticker that reads "18" and penalizes their sale to minors with a $1,000 fine for violations.
 The Director of the Crown Prosecution Service, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning informing that Huhne and Pryce would be brought to trial.
 Huhne has resigned, and Ed Davey MP will replace him in the cabinet. Norman Lamb MP is expected to take over the business ministerial role vacated by Davey.
 The 16th of February is the date on which Huhne and Pryce are scheduled to appear before the Westminster Magistrates Court.
 Nicholas Alden and Zachary Cuddeback, 25 and 21 years old respectively, died. The latter was driving.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered injuries to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required facial reconstruction surgery.
 Uka's gun jammed as he pointed it at the head of a fifth man. Schneider suffers permanent pain, has lost one eye, has a part of his skull missing and his face had to be rebuilt with titanium.
 Schneider testified via a virtual link from a U.S. Air Force base in his home country.
 Carpanedo participated in two individual races of the championship apart from the competition of Wednesday.
 The first was the slalom, in which she got a "Did Not Finish" for the first run, along with 36 of the 116 participants in that race.
 In her other race, the giant slalom, she placed tenth in the women's sitting group with a combined run time of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 minutes behind the first-place Austrian, Claudia Loesch, and 1:09.02 minutes behind the ninth-place finisher, Gyöngyi Dani, of Hungary.
 Four category skiers sitting did not complete their races and a total of 45 participants of 117 in the Giant Slalom did not reach the classification in the race.
 The Madhya Pradesh police force was able to recover the stolen laptop and cell phone.
 Deputy Inspector General D.K. Arya said: "We have arrested five individuals who misbehaved with the Swiss woman and recovered her mobile phone and laptop."
 Baba, Bhutha, Rampro, Gaza and Vishnu Kanjar are the accused.
 According to the superintendent of police, Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the accused appeared in court with their faces covered.
 Although there were three people inside the house at the time of the car impact, none of them suffered injuries.
 However, the driver suffered serious injuries to his head.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services pulled the driver of the red Audi TT from inside.
 At first, he was transferred to the James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Since then, Adekoya has been in the Edinburgh Sheriff Court, accused of the murder of her son.
 While she is in custody pending charges and trial, any statement by an eyewitness may be questionable, as her image has been widely disseminated.
 It is common practice in other parts of the UK, but as Scottish justice operates differently, the courts considered the publication of photographs to be potentially prejudicial.
 Pamela Ferguson, a professor at the University of Dundee, said: "It seems journalists are treading on dangerous ground when they publish pictures or other information about suspects.
 The Crown Office, which handles prosecutions, told reporters it would make no further comment at least until the indictment is issued.
 According to the information that leaked, the document will deal with the border conflict, which Palestine intends to resolve based on the boundaries in force prior to the 1967 Middle East War.
 Other topics that were also addressed, as reported, include the future status of Jerusalem, which both nations consider sacred, and the problem of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a constant military presence in the valley for ten years once the agreement is signed, while the PA only accepts five.
 During the pest control supplemental test, the rangers had to closely supervise the shooters, as they were monitored and evaluated for effectiveness.
 In a partnership between NPWS and the New South Wales Association of Sporting Shooters Inc., suitable volunteers were recruited from the Association's hunting program.
 Mick O'Flynn, who is in charge, provisionally, of the Conservation and Heritage Office of the NPWS, said that comprehensive training in safety and training was given to the four shooters chosen for the shooting operation.
 Yesterday, Martelly swore in a new nine-member Provisional Electoral Council (CEP, by its acronym in English).
 In four years, it is the fifth CEP of Martelly.
 Last month, a presidential commission advised the previous CEP to resign, as part of a series of measures aimed at leading the country to new elections.
 The commission was the way in which Martelly responded to the widespread demonstrations that began in October against the regime.
 The demonstrations, sometimes violent, were provoked by the fact that elections have not been held, in some cases since 2011.
 Nearly 60 cases of iPods with problems of operation and excessive heating have been reported, which caused six fires and minor burns to four people.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) reported 27 accidents involving these devices.
 Last week, METI announced that Apple had reported 34 additional overheating incidents, which the company categorized as “non-serious.”
 The ministry commented on the delay in the report of Apple, saying that it was something «truly regrettable».
 Mariana was shaken by a quake at 7:19 a.m. local time (21:19 GMT) on Friday.
 The Northern Marianas Emergency Management Agency said there were no reports of damage in the territory.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also reported no tsunami indicators.
 In Manila, the capital of the Philippines, a former police officer seized a bus and held hostage tourists who came from Hong Kong.
 Rolando Mendoza opened fire with his M16 against the foreign visitors.
 Several hostages have been rescued and, so far, at least six have been confirmed dead.
 Both the six hostages, including children and elderly, and the Filipino photographers were released early.
 Later, photographers took the place of an elderly woman because she needed to go to the bathroom. Mendoza was shot.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and began studying medicine.
 She trained in obstetrics and began working at Auckland's National Women's Hospital in 1959.
 Liggins began her research on premature birth in her spare time, while working at the hospital.
 His study showed that the fetal lung maturation of the baby could be accelerated through the administration of a hormone.
 Xinhua reported that on Wednesday government investigators were able to retrieve the flight recorders from the black box.
 Luna's fellow fighters also paid tribute to him.
 Tommy Dreamer said: «Luna was the first queen of the Extreme. She died on the night of the two moons, something unique, like her. A strong woman».
 Dustin Oro en Polvo Runnels stated: «Luna was as rare as I was; even more so. I love her and I will miss her. I hope she is in a better place».
 Since 2008, among the 1,400 surveyed prior to the 2010 federal elections, there was an 8% increase in those opposed to Australia becoming a republic.
 Julia Gillard, the acting prime minister, said during the 2010 federal election campaign that she believed Australia should become a republic once the reign of Queen Elizabeth II ended.
 34% of respondents share this view and want Elizabeth II to be the last queen to have Australia.
 At one end of the survey is a 29% of people who think Australia should become a republic as soon as possible; at the other, a 31% who believe it should never happen.
 The Olympic gold medalist was due to swim the 100m and 200m freestyle, and three relays at the Commonwealth Games, but his fitness has been called into question following his complaints.
 He has not been able to take painkillers to ease the pain, because they are banned from the Games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest prime number known.
 Many people verified the finding using various types of hardware and software and in early February and it was made public on Tuesday.
 Comets may have served as a source of water for our planet, as well as organic matter, which has the ability to form proteins and sustain life.
 The expectation of scientists is to understand how planets originate, in particular ours, given that comets crashed into the Earth a long time ago.
 Cuomo, 53, took office at the start of the year and last month signed a bill allowing same-sex couples to marry.
 He called the rumors "political chatter and nonsense."
 He is speculated to run for the presidency in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that, according to the Federal Aviation Administration, would reduce the distances of air routes, which would save millions of gallons of fuel per year, as well as carbon emissions.
 It employs satellite technology, in contrast to the old ground-based radar technology, in order to enable air traffic controllers to detect aircraft more accurately and provide more accurate data to pilots.
 No additional transportation will be implemented and trains will not stop at Wembley. Car parking and deterrent will not be available.
 Due to the concern generated by the possible lack of transportation, the possibility of the game being played behind closed doors, without the fans of the team, was considered.
 On Thursday, the journal Science reported on the discovery of a new species of bird on the Ecuadorian Galápagos Islands.
 Experts from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden have revealed that the new species evolved in just two generations, even though it was thought to take much longer, due to reproduction between an endemic Darwin finch, Geospiza fortes, and a migratory cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can take on all kinds of shapes and curl into tiny figures.
 Not only can it be hammered and rolled into sheets, but it can also be stretched to a very thin wire that can be twisted and braided.
 It can be made very thin and adhered to another metal. It is so thin that it was used to decorate the illustrations made by hand in books called "illuminated manuscripts".
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make a pH indicator using red cabbage juice.
 The color of the cabbage juice will be altered depending on how acidic or basic (alkaline) the chemical substance is.
 The number of hydrogen ions (the H in pH) present in the chemical being tested determines its pH level.
 Hydrogen atoms are made up of a proton and an electron. Therefore, a hydrogen ion is the result of stripping a proton of its electron.
 Shake both dry powders together and, after doing so, with clean and wet hands, squeeze them to form a ball.
 A reaction will occur between the moisture in your hands and your outer layers, which will feel strange to the touch and form a kind of shell.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had flush toilets in almost every house, which were connected to a sophisticated drainage system.
 In some homes of the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini, Greece, there were found vestiges of sewer systems.
 Toilets were also used in ancient Egypt, Persia and China. In Roman civilization, public baths had toilets and some were shared by men and women.
 When you communicate with someone who is thousands of miles away, you are using a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and then reflects it back almost instantly.
 The satellite was sent into space via a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space, since the light from the Earth's atmosphere distorts some of the light we see.
 A giant rocket, more than 100 feet tall, is needed to get a satellite or telescope into outer space.
 The wheel has changed the world in surprising ways. The most relevant thing it has done for us is to provide us with a much simpler and faster form of transportation.
 Thanks to it, today we have many means of transport, such as the railway or the car, among many others.
 Below, there are smaller felines that feed on medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small felines (including independent domestic cats) that feed on small species that exist in much greater quantity, such as insects, rodents, lizards and birds.
 The secret of their success is the concept of niche: each feline has a particular function, which prevents it from competing with others.
 Lions are the most social of all cats and live in large groups called prides.
 The herds are formed by one to three adult males of the same family group, joined with up to thirty females and their offspring.
 Generally, females are closely related to each other, making them a large family of sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides behave like those of wolves or dogs, with whom they share a surprising similarity (unlike other big cats) in both their behavior and in being highly lethal to their prey.
 An all-round athlete, the tiger has the ability to climb (but not very well), swim, jump and pull five times as hard as a robust person.
 The tiger is of the same genus (Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars. These are the only four felines capable of roaring.
 The tiger's roar is not a fully sonorous roar like the lion's, but rather a prayer of words spoken in growls and screams.
 Ocelots enjoy feeding on small creatures. If possible, they will hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds. Almost all of their prey will be much smaller than they are.
 Scientists believe that ocelots track and find animals to eat (prey) through smell, smelling the ground where they have passed.
 They have very good night vision and in dark places and, in addition, move very quietly. Ocelots hunt their prey by mimicking their surroundings and then rush on them.
 When a small group of living things (a small population) moves away from the main group from which they came (for example, if they move to a mountain range or a river, or if they move to a new island so that they cannot easily go back) they will often find themselves in a different environment to the one they were used to.
 The new environment has different resources and competitors, and therefore a new population will need different characteristics or adaptations than it had before to be a strong competitor.
 No changes have occurred in the original population, which still needs the same adaptations as in the past.
 As time passes, as the incipient population adapts to the new environment, it begins to resemble less and less the other population.
 Finally, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will look so different that they will not be able to be classified as the same species.
 This process is called speciation, which simply means the development of new species, and is an inevitable consequence and a fundamental part of evolution.
 Plants generate the oxygen that people breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide that they exhale (that they emit).
 Plants produce food with the energy of the sun, thanks to photosynthesis, and they also provide us with shade.
 We build our houses from plants and we make clothes from them too. Most of the food we eat is plants. Without them, animals would not survive.
 The Mosasaurus was the alpha predator of its time, so it feared nothing, except other members of its own species.
 Its long jaws had embedded more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, plus an additional group in the palate, which translates to anything that passed in front of it, had no escape.
 We are not sure, but it could have had viperine. Its diet included turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs and even could have been a cannibal.
 He also attacked any creature that entered the water: not even a dinosaur as huge as the T. Rex was a threat to him.
 While most of this food would be familiar to us, Romans also ate some unusual items at banquets, such as wild boar, peacock, snails, and even a type of rodent, the porcupine.
 Another thing that distinguished them was that the humble people and women ate sitting on a chair, while the wealthy enjoyed sharing banquets and throwing themselves sideways while eating.
 It is not possible that the recipes of ancient Rome included foods that arrived in Europe from America or Asia centuries later.
 For example, they had no corn, tomatoes, potatoes, or cocoa, and no Roman ever tasted a turkey.
 The Babylonians built for each of their gods a central temple considered their home.
 People brought sacrifices to the gods and priests sought to satisfy the needs of those by performing ceremonies and festivals.
 The temples had an open courtyard and then an inner sanctuary that only the priests could enter.
 Sometimes, special pyramid-shaped towers, called ziggurats, were built as part of the temples.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for their deity.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was not of major importance.
 The Hebrew families spent most of their time outdoors.
 The women cooked in the yard; the shops were just showcases that faced the street. The houses were built of stone.
 There were no large forests in the land of Canaan, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Very few inhabitants lived in Greenland. According to the Norse sagas, Erik the Red was exiled from Iceland for murder and, during a voyage he undertook further west, discovered the island and gave it its name.
 Even so, despite their discovery, the Eskimo tribes were already inhabiting the place by then.
 While each country was "Scandinavian" in its own right, there were marked differences in the people, monarchs, customs and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland.
 If you saw the movie National Treasure, you might think that a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 However, that is not true. While the reverse of the document does contain something written, it is not a map to a treasure.
 The Declaration of Independence is written on the back of the document, with the words "Original Declaration of Independence July 4, 1776" at the bottom of the document, upside down.
 Although it is not known for certain who wrote it, it is known that the enormous parchment document (measuring 29¾ inches by 24½ inches) was rolled up for storage.
 Therefore, it is likely that the notation was added only as a label.
 While the landings on D-Day, and subsequent fighting, had liberated northern France, the south remained.
 Its government was in the hands of the French of "Vichy", who were a group that, in 1940, had agreed to peace with the Germans and worked with the invaders instead of fighting against them.
 On August 15, 1940, the so-called «Operation Dragon» was deployed, through which the Allies invaded southern France.
 In just two weeks, American and Free French forces had liberated southern France and were moving on to Germany.
 A civilization can be defined as a specific culture that is part of an extensive group of people who live and work together; that is, a society.
 The term civilization derives from the Latin civilis, which means civil, and is related to the word civis, of the same language, which means citizen, as well as civitas, which means city or city state and which, in addition, determines in some way the size of the society.
 The city-states are the precursors of nations. A civilization culture entails a long generational transmission of knowledge, a lasting cultural legacy and a homogeneous propagation.
 Minority cultures tend to disappear without leaving any relevant historical traces, and fail to be recognized as civilizations in their own right.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen states formed, at first, a weak central government under the Articles of Confederation, in which the Congress was its only component.
 Congress had no power to levy taxes, and since there was no national executive or judicial authority, the states often failed to cooperate in enforcing all of their laws.
 Nor was he empowered to annul tax laws or tariffs between states.
 The articles required the unanimous approval of all states to proceed with their amendment and the states gave so little importance to the central government that their representatives used to absent themselves.
 The Italian national football team, along with the German national team, is the second most successful team in the world and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Among the sports that are practiced the most are football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula 1 races.
 Winter sports are more popular in the northern areas, with athletes participating in international tournaments and Olympic events.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 islands (the largest being Honshu), making it the seventh largest archipelago in the world.
 Due to the conglomerate/group of islands it contains, Japan is often referred to as an "archipelago", from a geographical point of view.
 The history of Taiwan dates back to the 15th century, when European sailors who sailed the area recorded the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, that is, beautiful island.
 The establishment, in 1624, by the Dutch East India Company, of a base in southwestern Taiwan, initiated a transformation in the aboriginal method of grain production, with the use of Chinese labour to work on their rice and sugar plantations.
 The Qing Dynasty (1644-1912) army took control of the northern and western coastal region of Taiwan in 1683 and declared Taiwan a province of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 In 1895, after being defeated during the First Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government adheres to the Treaty of Shimonoseki, through which it cedes sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, who retains control over the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu has three main constructions: Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun and the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings at the ends of the complex have been reconstructed so that tourists can see what they originally looked like.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had already been restored and work continues today.
 To exemplify, the most common format of still image photography globally is the 35 mm format, which was the most used film size towards the end of the analogue film era.
 Today it is still produced, but the most important thing is that its dimensional relationship was transferred to the image sensor formats of digital cameras.
 In fact, the 35 mm format is somewhat confusing, since its dimensions are 36 mm wide by 24 mm high.
 This is why the dimensional relationship of this format (divide by twelve to calculate the simplest ratio of whole numbers) is said to be 3:2.
 Many typical formats (e.g., the APS group of formats) are the same or similar to this aspect ratio.
 The rule of thirds, which has been the subject of constant jokes and ridicule, is a simple guideline that generates dynamism while allowing some order to the images.
 The most effective position for the central object is the intersection of the horizontal and vertical lines that divide the image into thirds (see example).
 During this phase of European history, the Catholic Church, which had accumulated wealth and power, was questioned.
 For more than a millennium, Christianity had managed to unite the European states despite their different languages and customs.
 Its power, present everywhere, affected everyone, from the monarch to the plebe.
 One of the most important principles of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that church funds should be reserved for that specific purpose.
 The central dome of the church had remained in Rome for more than a millennium and this concentration of power and money made many wonder if this principle was being respected.
 Shortly after the outbreak of hostilities, the British began a naval blockade of Germany.
 While the strategy, which involved the interruption of vital military and civilian supplies, was successful, it violated generally recognized international law and was contemplated in several international agreements of the past two centuries.
 Britain extracted international waters in entire sectors of the ocean to block the entry of ships, even putting at risk neutral vessels.
 Having received a reduced response to this tactic, Germany thought it would find a similar reaction to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 Throughout the 1920s, the attitude of most citizens and nations was one of pacifism and isolation.
 After seeing the horrors and atrocities of World War I, countries wanted to avoid a repeat of that in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States to take a job with the Edison Company in New York.
 He arrived in the United States with 4 cents, a book of poems and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor (his manager at his last job) addressed to Thomas Edison.
 Ancient China had a unique way of delimiting the different periods of time. Each stage or each family in power constituted a different dynasty.
 Between each dynasty, there was also a period of instability, with provinces divided. The most famous was the Three Kingdoms period, which lasted for 60 years, between the Han and Jin dynasties.
 During these stages, a bloody war broke out between many nobles who disputed the throne.
 One of the bloodiest periods in the history of Ancient China was the Three Kingdoms period, where thousands of people died in a struggle to occupy the throne of the great palace in Xi'an.
 There are many political and social consequences, such as the use of the metric system, the shift from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people, not to a single sovereign.
 Also, after the Revolution, the posts were open to all male candidates, which allowed the success of the most ambitious and prestigious.
 The same is true of the military, as instead of basing army ranks on classes, they are now based on caliber.
 The French Revolution was also a source of inspiration for many other oppressed working class people in other countries to take up their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in matters beyond this worldly life. He used to visit a cave which became known as Hira on the mountain of Noor (light) to reflect.
 The cave itself, which has endured the test of time, illustrates very realistically the spiritual inclinations of Muhammad.
 At the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, lies a cave totally detached from the rest of the planet.
 Indeed, it is very difficult to find, even if one were sure of its existence. Inside the cave, the isolation is total.
 Nothing can be seen but the wonderful clear sky and the numerous mountains in the surrounding area. From inside this cave, very little of this world can be seen or heard.
 Of the seven wonders, the only one that still stands is the Great Pyramid of Giza.
 The Great Pyramid, built by the Egyptian people in the 3rd century B.C., is one of many large, pyramid-shaped structures built to honor the deceased pharaoh.
 The Giza Plateau, or "Giza Necropolis", in the Valley of the Kings, in Egypt, contains numerous pyramids (of which the Great Pyramid is the largest), several smaller tombs, temples, and the Great Sphinx.
 The Great Pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Khufu, and many others of this type, smaller tombs and temples were erected in honor of his wives and family.
 The "upward bow" mark resembles a V and the "downward bow" mark is similar to a staple or a square without its bottom edge.
 Up means that you should start at the tip and push the bow, and down means that you should start at the heel, where the hand holds the bow, and pull it.
 The upward motion of the bow generates a softer sound, while a downward motion is louder and more abrupt.
 Feel free to make your own marks with pencil, but please remember that the marks on the bow instruments have been printed there for a musical purpose and should therefore be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, a mob of women from the marketplace forced the terrified monarch Louis XVI, Marie Antoinette, their two young children (Marie Thérèse, eleven, and Louis Charles, four), and the king's sister, Madame Elizabeth, to return to Paris from Versailles.
 They traveled back to Paris in a carriage surrounded by a mob shouting and throwing threats at the king and queen.
 The crowd forced the king and queen to open the windows of their carriage completely.
 At one point, a participant in the revolt shook the head of a royal guard executed in Versailles in front of the queen, who was in panic.
 The Filipino people themselves paid the costs of the war of U.S. imperialism in the conquest of the Philippines.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the US colonial regime to cover most of the interest and principal payments on bonds that were floated in the name of the Philippine government in Wall Street banks.
 Already, the super profits derived from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people would constitute the main gains of US imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, it is necessary to understand the context that gave rise to the establishment of the order.
 The European historical period in which these events took place is commonly known as the High Middle Ages, between the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (i.e., between the years 1000 and 1300 AD).
 The High Middle Ages was preceded by the Early Middle Ages and followed by the Late Middle Ages which, by convention, ends around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a concept that encompasses, pragmatically, a wide range of ideas, from the technological imperative to a strict sense of there being an underlying logic that drives the destiny of humanity and that relates to the laws of science and how they are embodied in technology.
 Almost all interpretations of technological determinism have in common two general ideas: that technological development itself unfolds along a path independent of any cultural or political influence, and that, at the same time, technology has “effects” on societies that are inherent and not socially conditioned.
 To take one example, one might argue that the existence of automobiles necessarily entails the development of highways.
 However, a national road network is not economically viable for a small volume of cars, so new manufacturing techniques are being developed to reduce the cost of owning a vehicle.
 The mass use of automobiles also generates a higher incidence of traffic accidents, which leads to the development of new techniques in the field of health to repair damaged bodies.
 The element of cultural determinism was very present in romanticism, according to scholars like Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the context of Romanticism, geography shaped people and, over time, customs and cultures developed that were related to that geography and, being in harmony with the location of that society, were preferable to laws that were imposed arbitrarily.
 Just as Paris is known as the fashion capital of the world today, Constantinople was considered as such in feudal Europe.
 Its reputation as a center of luxury began around 400 B.C. and lasted until approximately 1100 A.D.
 During the twelfth century its status declined, mainly because, on their return, the crusaders brought gifts, such as silks and spices, which were more highly valued than the goods offered in the Byzantine markets.
 The title of "capital of fashion" was transferred, from then on, from Constantinople to Paris.
 The peak of the Gothic style took place in the period between the 10th-11th and 14th centuries.
 At first, the way of dressing received great influence from the Byzantine culture in the east.
 However, due to the slowness of communication channels, Western styles could take a delay of 25 to 30 years.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the most significant advances of that time was that, as a result of the Crusades, people began to use buttons to fasten their clothes.
 Subsistence agriculture is understood as that whose objective is to produce enough food to meet exclusively the needs of the farmer and his family group.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple, generally organic practice that combines the use of regionally native stored seeds with crop rotation or other comparatively simple methods to maximize production.
 Historically, much of the main activity of farmers was subsistence agriculture, which is still practiced in many developing countries.
 Subcultures congregate individuals with similar ideas and feelings of marginalization from social standards and provide them with the opportunity to generate a sense of identity.
 There are many factors that can distinguish subcultures: age, ethnicity, class, location or gender of their members.
 The features that distinguish a subculture may be linguistic, aesthetic, sexual, geographic, or related to religion or politics, or a mixture of factors.
 It is common for members of a subculture to exhibit traits of their membership by using distinctive and symbolic style, such as fashions, gestures, and jargon.
 One of the most commonly used mechanisms to graph the importance of socialization is to analyze the few and unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune or intentional abuse, were not socialized by adults during their growth.
 These children are called “feral”. Some feral children are confined by people, usually their parents. In some cases, the abandonment of a child is due to the parents’ rejection of the child’s severe intellectual or physical disability.
 It is possible that the wild children have suffered traumatic situations or severe child abuse before being abandoned or running away.
 Others are said to have been raised by animals and some have lived on their own in the wild.
 When the wild child is raised exclusively by animals other than humans, it displays behaviors (within its physical capabilities) almost entirely similar to those of the specific animal that raised it, as well as its fear or indifference towards people.
 While project-based learning should facilitate that process and make it more interesting, scaffolding goes a little further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning technique; it is, rather, an aid that provides support to those who are experiencing a new experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 The scaffolding can be presented in both real and virtual format; to put it another way, a teacher is a type of scaffolding, but so is the animated little paperclip in Microsoft Office.
 Virtual scaffolding is incorporated into the software and its function is to question, stimulate or explain procedures that may have been complex for the student alone.
 Children are placed in foster homes for a wide variety of reasons, from neglect to abuse and even extortion.
 No child should ever have to grow up in an environment where there is no love, care and education; but it happens.
 We can see that the foster care system provides a safe environment for these children.
 The goal of our foster care system is to provide safe homes, loving foster parents, sustained education, and reliable medical care.
 The aim of foster care is to meet all the needs that were not being met in the home from which they were previously removed.
 The Internet unites and mixes components of mass communication and between people.
 The different features that the Internet presents open up new dimensions from the perspective of the concept of uses and rewards.
 For example, "learning" and "socialization" are cited as significant incentives for Internet use (James et al., 1995).
 During a study of user reactions to websites conducted by Eighmey and McCord (1998), "personal involvement" and "long-term relationships" were also detected as new motivational factors.
 Through the recording of videos, important findings have been made in the interpretation of microexpressions, which are movements in the face of only a few milliseconds duration.
 Specifically, it is argued that, through the proper reading of their microexpressions, it is possible to detect whether a person is lying.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article The President's Speech, explained how those who cannot understand speech because of brain damage can nevertheless assess sincerity accurately.
 He even suggests that skills for interpreting human behavior can be shared with animals, such as domestic dogs.
 Through the research work of the twentieth century it has been demonstrated that there are two groups of genetic variation: the hidden and the manifest.
 The process of mutation incorporates a new genetic variation; the process of selection removes it from the set of variations.
 Segregation and recombination shuffle variation from one generation to the next.
 In the savannah, it is not easy for a primate, whose digestive system is the same as that of humans, to satisfy its amino acid needs with the vegetable resources available.
 Not doing so causes serious problems: slowing down growth, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 The proteins present in leaves and legumes would have been the most easily accessible source of plant food, but they are not easily digestible for primates like us, unless they are cooked.
 In contrast, animal foods (ants, termites, eggs) are easy to digest while providing a large number of proteins that contain all the essential amino acids.
 In the end, it should not surprise us if our own ancestors solved their “protein problems” in the same way as the savannah chimpanzees do today.
 Interrupted sleep consists of intentionally waking up during the normal sleep period and falling asleep again after a while (10 to 60 minutes).
 This can be easily achieved with a more or less gentle alarm clock that will bring him back to a conscious state, though not fully awake.
 Registration is an additional requirement for the visa process. In some countries, you will have to register your presence and the address of your accommodation with the local authorities.
 Other options that are based on the biological rhythm consist of drinking a lot of liquid (especially water or tea, known diuretic) before going to bed, which will force him to get up to urinate.
 The level of inner peace a person enjoys is inversely related to the amount of tension in his body and in his spirit.
 The lower the tension, the more positive the life force we have. Each of us has the potential to find absolute peace and happiness.
 We can all reach enlightenment. The only thing that hinders the way is our tension and negativity.
 While the foundations of Tibetan Buddhism are the teachings of Buddha, they have been extended by the Mahayana path of love and numerous yoga techniques from India.
 In general, laism is very simple. It is based on kundalini yoga, meditation and the path of love that encompasses everything.
 In Kundalini Yoga, the Kundalini energy (enlightenment) is activated with yoga positions, breathing practices, mantras or visualizations.
 Tibetan meditation focuses on Devata Yoga. Through the visualization of various deities, the energy channels can be unblocked, the chakras activated and the consciousness of enlightenment developed.
 The cooperation between the USSR and the USA was the result of facing a common enemy, Germany, during the Second World War. After the war, the clashes of system, process and culture ended up distancing the two countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, those who were allies were now enemies and the Cold War began.
 It would last for the next 40 years and would be fought for real, through proxy militias, on battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba, among many other places.
 Because by September 17, 1939, the Polish defense was already broken, their only hope was to retreat and reorganize on the Romanian bridgehead.
 However, these plans fell into disuse almost overnight, when more than 800,000 Red Army soldiers of the Soviet Union entered and formed the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after invading the eastern regions of Poland, violating the Treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact and other international, bilateral and multilateral agreements.
 Using ships to transport goods is a much more efficient way to move large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 The function of the navy has always been to ensure that its country retains the ability to move its population and goods, while interfering with the enemy's ability to do the same.
 The North Atlantic campaign in World War II provides one of the clearest and most recent examples of this. The Americans were trying to move men and material across the Atlantic to support Britain.
 At the same time, the German navy, using mainly submarines, tried to stop this traffic.
 If the Allies had not succeeded, Germany could have taken power in Britain, as it did in the other European countries.
 Goats were apparently domesticated for the first time about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros Mountains of Iran.
 In order to easily obtain their milk, hair, meat and leather, ancient peoples and tribes began to keep them.
 Domestic goats were usually gathered into herds that wandered the hills or other grazing areas, often tended by goat herders who were often children or teenagers, similar to the more popular shepherd. These methods of grazing are still used today.
 In England, railways were already installed by the 16th century.
 Even though the rails of the carts were made of simple parallel wooden planks, they allowed the horses that pulled them to achieve greater speed and to haul heavier loads than on the somewhat rougher roads of the day.
 The incorporation of sleepers to keep the rails in place occurred quite early. However, gradually, they realized that the rails would be more efficient if they were coated with iron on their top.
 This became a common practice, although the iron caused greater wear on the wooden wheels of the carriages.
 Eventually, wooden wheels were replaced with iron ones and, in 1767, solid iron rails began to be used.
 The first form of transportation that was known was walking. The human being began to do it in an upright position two million years ago with the appearance of Homo Erectus (which means upright man).
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecus, did not have the habit of walking upright.
 While bipedal traces have been found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, it is possible that Sahelanthropus walked on two legs 7 million years ago.
 We can start living a more planet-friendly life, join environmental movements, or even become activists and fight to reduce, in some way, future suffering.
 It is, in many cases, like the treatment of asymptomatic. But if we are not looking for a temporary situation, we should find the root of the problems and try to deactivate them.
 It is evident that the world has undergone great changes, as a result of the technological and scientific advances of humanity, and the problems have intensified because of overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyle of people.
 After being approved by Congress on July 4, a handwritten draft was sent by hand and signed by the president of Congress, John Hancock, and the secretary, Charles Thomson, to the printing press of John Dunlap, a few blocks away.
 Between 150 and 200 copies were made during the night, which are now known as the "Dunlap copies".
 It was John Nixon who first read the document and did so in the Independence Hall courtyard on July 8.
 A copy was sent to George Washington on July 6, who ordered it read to his army in New York on July 9. Another copy arrived in London on August 10.
 Dunlap's 25 photographs, which are known to still exist, are the oldest copies of the document. The original manuscript has been lost.
 A large number of paleontologists believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and is still alive today. They are the birds.
 Many people don't picture them as dinosaurs, since they have feathers and can fly.
 However, there are many features in birds that still resemble dinosaurs.
 They have scaly limbs and claws, lay eggs and move on their hind legs like the T-Rex.
 Nowadays, almost all computers operate on the basis of the manipulation of data encoded under the binary system.
 A binary number can only have one of two values, they are 0 and 1 and, according to computer jargon, these numbers are known as binary digits, or bits.
 Internal poisoning may not be immediately evident. Symptoms such as vomiting are too common to be able to make an immediate diagnosis.
 The clearest indicator of internal poisoning may be finding an open bottle of toxic chemical medicines or cleaning products.
 Read the label for specific first aid information for that specific poison.
 Entomologists use the term parasitic insect in a formal sense to refer to this group of arthropods.
 The word comes from its ancient relationship with bedbugs, a species very developed to parasitize humans.
 Bed bugs and assassin bugs are nesting; they are adapted to live in the nest or home of their host.
 The number of cases of multiple sclerosis (MS) in the United States is estimated at about 400,000, making it the most common neurological disease among young and middle-aged adults.
 The central nervous system, the union of the brain, the spinal cord and the optic nerve, is the target of multiple sclerosis.
 Studies have indicated that women are twice as likely as men to suffer from MS.
 A couple might conclude that raising a baby would not be the best thing for them or for the child.
 These couples could choose to plan for the adoption of a baby.
 In an adoption, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that a different couple can take care of the child.
 The capital aim of science is to decipher the way the world works through the scientific method. Indeed, this method serves as a guide for most scientific research.
 It is not, however, an experimentation, it is a test that is used to discard one or more of the possible hypotheses, asking questions and observations that guide scientific research.
 The focus of both naturalists and philosophers was put on the classical works; especially, on the Latin version of the biblical text.
 The thoughts of Aristotle, especially the questions of science, even psychology, were accepted.
 As the dominance of the Greek language waned, the West distanced itself from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Often, many rhythms present in physiological processes and in behavior depend decisively on internal cycles and their production through biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which are not only reactions to regular external stimuli, have been recorded in almost all living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks oscillate autonomously and have a free cyclical operating period, even if there are no external stimuli.
 One of the key indicators that DNA was a genetic material was the experiment conducted by Hershey and Chase.
 Hershey and Chase inserted their own DNA into a bacterium using phages, or viruses.
 They performed two experiments in which they labeled the phage DNA with radioactive phosphorus or the DNA protein with radioactive sulfur.
 Depending on the type of mutation, the significance of the affected piece of genetic material, and whether it involves germ cells, the mutation can have various effects.
 Only mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while those that occur elsewhere can cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism often attracts people interested in visiting natural areas to enjoy the scenery, which includes wildlife and plant life.
 Some examples of possible activities in the place are: hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching and visit to parks, and study of ecosystem information.
 An example is to visit, take photographs and learn about orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave small towns in their cars to go to work and they often cross paths with others whose jobs are in the place they have just left.
 In this dynamic transfer shuttle, everyone is somehow connected to and sustained by a system of transportation based on the use of private automobiles.
 Scientists now believe that this massive carbon economy has deprived the biosphere of one of its regular states that has contributed to the evolution of humanity for the past two million years.
 Everyone is part of society and uses transport systems; and almost everyone complains about them.
 In developed countries, it is rare to hear similar levels of complaints about water quality or bridge collapses.
 Why do transportation systems give rise to complaints of this magnitude and why do failures occur on a daily basis? Are transportation engineers simply incompetent or is there something more substantial going on?
 Traffic flow is the study of the individual movement of drivers and vehicles between two points and of the interactions between them.
 Unfortunately, it is not easy to study traffic flow, since it is not possible to make accurate predictions about the behavior of drivers.
 Fortunately, there is a tendency for drivers to maintain relatively consistent behavior, which allows traffic flows to have a logical consistency and can be the subject of approximate mathematical representation.
 In order to more clearly graph the flow of circulation, relationships were established between the three most important elements: (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) velocity.
 These relationships facilitate both the planning and design and the operations of the roadway devices.
 The first species to fly were insects, which helped them to escape their enemies more easily and to find food and mates more effectively.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings back, attaching them to the sides of their bodies.
 This gives them a larger range of possible small places to hide from predators.
 Currently, anisoptera and ephemeroptera are the only insects unable to fold their wings.
 Millennia ago, a man named Aristarchus commented that the Solar System revolved around the Sun.
 Some shared his theory, but many others believed the opposite: that the solar system orbited the Earth, even the Sun and other stars.
 This seems to make sense, since on Earth we don't perceive its movement, right?
 The Amazon River is the largest and second longest river in the world. It contains 8 times more water than the next largest river.
 In addition, the Amazon is the widest river on the planet, in some places with a width of up to six miles.
 Of the total water flowing from the world's rivers into the oceans, 20 percent comes from the Amazon.
 The great Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 miles) long and receives water from thousands of smaller rivers.
 Although stone pyramids continued to be built until the end of the Old Kingdom, none could surpass those of Giza, either in size or in the sublime technique of their construction.
 The ancient Egyptian people of the New Kingdom were awed by the monuments of their ancestors, which dated back more than a millennium.
 With approximately 800 inhabitants, Vatican City is the smallest independent country in the world and the least populated.
 Italian is used in Vatican City, both for drafting its legislation and for issuing its official communications.
 The language spoken daily by most of those who work within the state is also Italian, and the use of Latin is generally reserved for religious ceremonies.
 All citizens living in Vatican City are members of the Roman Catholic Church.
 Basic chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper have been known since ancient times, since they can be found in their original form in nature and are relatively easy to extract with rudimentary tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle developed the theory that everything is made up of a combination of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air and fire.
 This was more similar to the states of matter (with the same order): solid, liquid, gaseous and plasma, only that, at the same time, he had the theory that they transform into new substances that make up the things we see.
 Alloys are basically a combination of two or more metals. Remember that the periodic table has many elements.
 Metals are considered to be elements such as calcium and potassium. There are also metals such as gold and silver.
 It is also possible that alloys with small amounts of non-metallic elements, such as carbon, exist.
 Everything in the Universe is made of matter, which is composed of tiny particles called atoms.
 The size of atoms is so impressively tiny that the end point of this sentence could contain billions of them.
 So when it was invented, the pencil made many friends.
 Unfortunately, as a result of the implementation of new writing methods, the pencil is used less and has lost its status.
 Nowadays, people write messages on the screens of their computers. They don't even need to approach a typewriter.
 It remains to be seen what will become of the keyboard when something new comes along.
 The atomic bomb operates on the principle that energy is required to form a nucleus with a large number of protons and neutrons.
 It is similar to what happens when a heavy car is rolling up a hill. By splitting the core once more, it releases some of that energy.
 The nuclei of some atoms are unstable, that is, they tend to break down with little or no push.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rocks and dust and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The crust has a thickness of about 70 km on the near side and 100 km on the far side.
 It is thinner under the lunar seas and thicker under the highlands.
 There may be more seas on the near side because its crust is thinner, which made it easier for lava to rise to the surface.
 Content theories focus on what it is that attracts or pleases people.
 These doctrines hold that people have certain needs or desires that have been internalized as they grew to maturity.
 These theories analyze what causes certain people to want the things they do and what factors in their environment force them to do or not do certain things.
 Two well-known theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, there are two types of behavior when managers begin to lead their former colleagues. On one side of the spectrum is the attempt to continue being "one of the guys" (or girls).
 Managers in this category have a hard time making decisions that employees don't like, imposing disciplinary measures, conducting performance evaluations, assigning responsibilities, and holding employees accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, it mutates into an unrecognizable person who believes it necessary to modify everything that the group has been doing until now and to do it in its own way.
 After all, the ultimate responsibility for the success and failure of the team is the leader.
 This way of behaving often ends up distancing the leaders from the other members of the team.
 The same standards of excellence that conventional teams apply apply to virtual teams, although there are small differences.
 Often, members of a virtual team act as a point of contact for their closest physical group.
 They generally enjoy more autonomy than members of a traditional group, because their teams can meet according to different time zones, which, for example, might not be understood by the local management.
 The existence of a real "invisible team" (Larson and LaFasto, 1989 p. 109) is also an exclusive element of virtual teams.
 The "invisible team" is the group in charge of management and to which each member reports. It is the one that sets the standards for each member.
 What could be the motive for an organization to undergo the demanding process of establishing a learning organization? One of the purposes of applying the theoretical concepts of organizational learning is to drive innovation.
 When all available resources are properly utilized in the operational departments of an organization, it creates room for creativity and ingenuity.
 As a result, it is possible that the process of an organization working as a team to overcome a difficulty leads to a new innovative process in order to meet the needs of customers.
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must first generate a culture of innovation, as well as shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the continuous approach as a method used to help organizations achieve a higher level of performance.
 Neurobiological data offer factual evidence for a theoretical approach to the research of cognition. They therefore reduce the field of research and give it greater accuracy.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior contributes to the research of scientists.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumors affect behavior and cause changes in mental functions.
 Thanks to the rise of new technologies, we have the possibility to see and investigate structures and processes that occur in the brain that have never been seen before.
 This gives us plenty of information and material to develop simulation models, which enhance our understanding of mental processes.
 While artificial intelligence is often associated with science fiction, it is a specialty of great relevance within computer science, which is responsible for the behavior, learning and intelligent adaptation in a machine.
 Research in the field of AI involves the development of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples of this are, among others, monitoring, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to customer diagnoses and queries, as well as facial recognition, writing, voice.
 These issues have become separate disciplines, focused on providing solutions to real-life problems.
 Artificial Intelligence is now often used in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering and the military, as well as in various applications of video games and personal computers.
 Field trips are an important part of any classroom. It is common for a teacher to want to take her students to places that are not accessible by bus.
 The solution comes from technology, through virtual excursions. Students can observe the objects exhibited in a museum, visit an aquarium or contemplate beautiful works of art sitting with their class.
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also a great way to reflect on an outing and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, every year, the students at Bennet School in North Carolina design a web page about their trip to the state capital, and every year the page is updated, but the previous versions are kept online as a scrapbook.
 Blogs can also help improve students' writing. Although students often begin their blogging experience with poor grammar and spelling, this generally improves with the presence of an audience.
 Because students are often the most critical readers, the blog writer begins to strive to improve his writing in order to avoid criticism.
 Blogging, moreover, “requires students to be more understanding of the world around them.” The need to engage the audience inspires them to be smart and interesting (Toto, 2004).
 Blogs are a resource that inspires collaboration and encourages students to deepen their learning beyond the typical school day.
 The proper use of blogs «can empower students to be more analytical and critical, through the active response to the contents of the Internet, they can define their positions in the context of the writings of others, in addition to establishing their perspectives on specific topics» (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is the captivating bilingual capital of Canada and boasts a variety of museums and art galleries that display the country's history and current events.
 Niagara Falls are further south and the north hosts the unspoiled natural beauty of Muskoka and the surrounding area.
 All these aspects, among others, are what make Ontario seem intrinsically Canadian to foreigners.
 The large areas further north are sparsely populated and some are wilderness, almost uninhabited.
 To make a population comparison that is a great surprise to many: there are more African Americans living in the United States than Canadians.
 The location of the islands of East Africa is off the east coast of that continent, in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and a continent in itself if we talk about wildlife.
 Most of the smaller islands are independent states or associated with France and are popular for their beaches and luxury resorts.
 Islam was also brought to the lands by the Arabs and was imposed, to a large extent, in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 The initial point of European influence and colonialism took place in the 15th century, as a result of the discovery, by the Portuguese explorer, Vasco da Gama, of the route that connects the Cape of Europe with India.
 The region is bordered by the Sahel to the north, and the Atlantic Ocean to the south and west.
 Women: All female visitors are advised to say they are married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It will also be useful to use a ring (just make sure it doesn't look too expensive).
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can cause what they consider harassment, and that it is not uncommon to be followed, taken by the arm, etc.
 Be firm in rejecting men and do not hesitate to defend your position (cultural differences or not, that is not right!).
 The founders of the modern city of Casablanca were the Berber fishermen during the 10th century BC and the Phoenicians, Romans and Merinids used it as a strategic port, called Anfa.
 It was destroyed and rebuilt by the Portuguese under the name of Casa Branca, but in 1755 they abandoned it after an earthquake.
 The city was rebuilt by order of the Moroccan Sultan with the name of Daru l-Badya and the Spanish merchants who installed their businesses in that place called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the most boring places in all of Morocco to go shopping.
 In the surroundings of the old Medina, there are plenty of places where traditional Moroccan items are sold, such as clay pots, ceramics, leather products, water pipes and a whole range of trinkets, although everything is geared towards tourists.
 Goma is a tourist destination in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, on the eastern border, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, lava from the Nyiragongo volcano destroyed Goma and left much of its streets submerged, especially in the city center.
 While Goma is fairly safe, any visit to the outside should be considered in order to take note of the situation of the confrontations that persist in the province of North Kivu.
 In turn, the city is the base for climbing the Nyiragongo volcano and its excursions to see mountain gorillas are among the cheapest in Africa.
 To get around Goma, you can take a boda-boda (mototaxi). The regular (local) fare is CDF500 (Congolese francs) for a short trip.
 This, combined with the fact that it is relatively inaccessible, has given Timbuktu an image of an exotic and distant land.
 Although today Timbuktu is a poor city, it still has an airport and its reputation makes it a tourist attraction.
 In 1990, it was included in the list of places of human heritage at risk, due to the threat of desert sands.
 It was one of the most important stops on Henry Louis Gates's PBS special, In Search of the African American Roots of Jazz.
 The city contrasts a lot with the rest of the country, as it has a more Arabic style than African.
 Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in northeastern South Africa and extends along the border with Mozambique in the east, Zimbabwe in the north and the Crocodile River in the south.
 The park has an area of 19,500 km2 and is divided into 14 different ecozones, each of which has a different wildlife.
 This is one of the most important attractions in South Africa and is recognized as the main icon of the South African National Parks (SANParks).
 As with all South African nature reserves, there are daily conservation and park entrance fees.
 It may also be worthwhile to buy a Wild Card that allows entry to selections of parks in South Africa or to all National Parks in the country.
 The territory of Hong Kong takes its name from the homonymous island, which is the destination most of the tourists consider the main attraction.
 The deployment of buildings that delimit the horizon of Hong Kong has been compared to a light bar graph that is evidenced by the presence of the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 The best way to enjoy the best views of Hong Kong is to leave the island and head to the Kowloon waterfront, located across the bay.
 It is in the reclaimed lands of the north coast of Hong Kong where its urban development is concentrated, densely.
 This is the site that the British conquerors adopted as their own, so if you want to see evidence of the colonial past of this region, it is a convenient place to start.
 The Sundarbans are the largest coastal mangrove forest in the world, stretching 80 km (50 miles) from the coast into Bangladesh and India.
 UNESCO has declared the Sundarbans a World Heritage Site. The forest section within the Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 Notwithstanding, the forests are not only mangroves, but they possess some of the last trees that remain of the imposing jungles that once covered the Gangetic plain.
 The Sundarbans comprise an area of 3850 km2 and nearly a third of its extension is covered by water or marshy areas.
 The Sundarbans have been a wildlife sanctuary since 1966 and it is estimated that there are now 400 Bengal tigers and some 30,000 spotted deer in the area.
 Buses leave from the inter-district station (across the river) throughout the day, though most, especially those going east and to Jakar (also called Bumthang), leave between 6:30 and 7:30 a.m.
 Because buses between districts are often crowded, it is recommended to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Almost all districts have the service of Japanese buses Coaster, which are comfortable and durable.
 Sharing a taxi is a quick and convenient way to travel to nearby places, such as Paro (150 ngultrums) and Punakha (200 ngultrums).
 The Oyapock Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge crossing the Oyapock River, connecting Oiapoque, a Brazilian city, and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, in French Guiana.
 The two towers reach a height of 83 m, with a length of 378 m and two lanes of 3.5 m wide.
 Under the bridge there is a 15-meter-wide space, and although its construction was completed in August 2011, it was not opened to traffic until March 2017.
 Full operation of the bridge is estimated for September 2017, which is when Brazilian customs controls are expected to end.
 The area that now constitutes eastern Paraguay was inhabited by the Guaraní, who were the most important indigenous group in the region and lived as semi-nomadic hunter-gatherers, as well as practicing subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region was home to other aboriginal groups, for example, the Guaycurú and Payaguá, who hunted, gathered and fished as a means of subsistence.
 Paraguay, formerly known as the «Gigantic Province of the Indies», was born in the 16th century, as a result of the encounter between Spanish conquerors and the native indigenous peoples.
 The Spanish started the colonization stage, which lasted for three centuries.
 Since Asunción was founded in 1537, Paraguay has been able to preserve much of its aboriginal idiosyncrasy and identity.
 Argentina is famous for having one of the best teams and the best players of polo in the world.
 The most important tournament of the year takes place in December at the polo fields of Las Cañitas.
 Other tournaments and lower-level matches can also be seen at other times of the year.
 On the website of the Argentine Polo Association you will find information about tournaments and where to buy tickets for polo matches.
 The value of the Falkland Islands pound (FKP), the official currency of the Falkland Islands, is fixed in equivalence with the British pound (GBP).
 There is only one bank on the islands. You can change your money there. It is opposite the FIC West shop in Stanley.
 Pounds sterling are usually accepted anywhere within the islands. In Stanley, credit cards and US dollars are also accepted.
 There is a chance that credit cards will not be accepted in the outer islands, but you may be able to use British or US currency. Ask the owners in advance to find out what method of payment is accepted.
 It is virtually impossible to change money from the Falkland Islands outside the archipelago, so make sure you do it before you leave.
 Because Montevideo is located in the southern hemisphere, it is summer when it is winter in the northern hemisphere and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics, with frequent temperatures above +30° C during the summer.
 Winter cold can be deceptive: while it is very rare for temperatures to fall below freezing, wind and humidity interact to make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no specific "rainy" or "dry" seasons; the amount of rain remains almost the same throughout the year.
 While many of the park's animals are used to seeing people, wildlife is still wild, so don't feed or disturb it.
 According to the instructions of the park authorities, you must keep at least 100 yards/meters away from bears and wolves, and 25 yards/meters from the rest of the wild animals.
 Despite how docile they may look, bison, wapiti, moose, bears and virtually all large animals can be aggressive.
 Dozens of visitors are injured every year by not keeping a proper distance. These animals are large, wild and potentially dangerous; therefore, respect their space.
 Also, remember that smells attract bears and other wildlife, so avoid having or cooking foods that give off a lot of aroma and keep the camp clean.
 The capital of Samoa, Apia, is located on the island of Upolu and has just under 40,000 inhabitants.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In 1889, the port was the scene of a nefarious naval confrontation when seven German, American and English ships refused to leave the port.
 They sank all the ships, except a British cruiser. Nearly two hundred Americans and Germans were killed.
 During the Mau independence war, a peaceful meeting in the town ended with the assassination of the head of state, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 There are a large number of beaches, as Auckland has two harbours. The most famous are in three areas.
 In the North Harbour district, on the Pacific Ocean, are the beaches of North Shore, which stretch from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 The beaches are almost all sandy with safe swimming spots and mostly have pohutukawa trees that offer shady spots.
 In the port of Waitemataas are the beaches of Tamaki Drive, in the extravagant neighborhoods of Mission Bay and St Heliers, in the central region of Auckland.
 These are family beaches, sometimes very crowded, with numerous and varied shops available on the thing. They are also safe for swimming.
 Number One is the most popular local beer and is not complex, but rather pleasant and refreshing. The other regional beer is Manta.
 While there is a wide variety of French wines, those from New Zealand and Australia could be considered better for transport.
 Tap water is completely safe to drink, but if you are concerned, you can easily find bottled water.
 Australians consider the notion of "flat white" coffee to be foreign. A small black coffee is called an "espresso", cappuccino is served with cream (rather than froth) and tea is not served with milk.
 Hot chocolate is up to Belgian standards. Fruit juices are expensive, but delicious.
 Numerous trips to the reef are made throughout the year and, there, injuries from any of these causes are rare.
 However, accept the advice of the authorities, respect all signs and pay special attention to security alerts.
 Cubomedusae are located near beaches and river estuaries from October to April, north of 1770. Sometimes they can be found outside this period.
 Sharks do exist, but they almost never attack people. Most of them are afraid of people and would swim away.
 The ocean is not the place where saltwater crocodiles actively reside. Their primary habitat is the estuaries of the rivers that are located north of Rockhampton.
 Booking accommodation in advance of your trip gives you the peace of mind that you will have a place to sleep when you arrive at your destination.
 Travel agents usually have agreements with specific hotels, although through them it is also possible to book other types of accommodation, such as camping areas.
 Travel agents usually offer packages that include breakfast, transfers to and from the airport, and even combined flight and accommodation packages.
 They can also hold the reservation for you in case you need time to think about the offer, or to obtain other documents for your destination (such as a visa).
 However, any modification or request must be made through the travel agent first, and not directly through the hotel.
 At some festivals, most of those attending the musical events choose to camp on site and most of the audience consider it a crucial aspect of the experience.
 If you want to see the action up close, then you should arrive early to the campground to get a spot near the music events.
 It should be noted that, while the musical performances may have ended, in other areas of the festival could continue until late at night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you are crossing the Baltic Sea in winter, check where the cabin is located, as going through the ice makes a lot of noise for those who are most affected.
 During the cruises to St. Petersburg, time is also spent in the city. Those who disembark are exempt from visa requirements (see terms).
 Casinos typically make great efforts to maximize the time and money their customers spend. There are usually no windows or clocks, and exits can be hard to find.
 They often offer special promotions of food, drink and entertainment in order to keep guests in good spirits and within the premises.
 Some establishments serve free spirits. Although drunkenness affects judgment and every good player knows the importance of staying sober.
 Anyone who intends to drive in high latitudes or in mountain passes must anticipate the possibility of snow, ice or low temperatures.
 On ice or snow, there is little friction, so it is not possible to drive as it does on bare asphalt.
 During snowstorms, so much snow can fall that it can trap you in very little time.
 In addition, visibility can be reduced by snowfall or by condensation or ice that forms on the car windows.
 On the other hand, in many countries the ice and snow conditions are normal and traffic flows almost without interruption throughout the year.
 Safaris are probably the biggest tourist attraction in Africa and the most memorable part for many visitors.
 The popular use of the term safari refers to overland trips to see the amazing wildlife of Africa, particularly in the savannah.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, are often close to vehicles and standard equipment will allow good viewing.
 On occasion, lions, cheetahs and leopards can be shy, so you will have more opportunity to observe them using binoculars.
 The excursion known as walking safari (also called «walking among the bushes», «hiking safari» or «walking») consists of hiking, either for a few hours or for several days.
 The Paralympic Games will take place between 24 August and 5 September 2021, with a number of events taking place in other parts of Japan.
 Host of the 1964 Games, Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Summer Olympic Games.
 If you booked your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the postponement announcement, you may face complications.
 There are different types of travel cancellation policies, but as of late March, the coverage of most of these policies based on the coronavirus does not extend until July 2020, which is when the Olympic Games are scheduled.
 Most event tickets are expected to cost between JPY 2500 and JPY 130 000, and common passes are expected to cost JPY 7000.
 Ironing clothes while they are still damp can help dry them. Many hotels have an iron and ironing board for guests to use, even if they are not in their room.
 If you don't have an iron available, or don't want to use an iron, you can try a hair dryer, if available.
 Be careful not to let the fabric get too hot, as it could shrink or, in extreme cases, burn.
 There are different methods for purifying water, some more effectively attacking certain specific threats.
 In some places, it is enough to boil water for a minute, in others, several more are necessary.
 Not all filters are equally effective, and if this concerns you, you should consider buying bottled water with a seal from a certified company.
 Travellers may encounter pests of which they are not aware in the regions from which they come.
 Pests are capable of ruining food, causing irritation or, in more serious cases, causing allergic reactions, spreading poison or transmitting infections.
 Infectious diseases, by themselves, or dangerous animals, which can injure or kill individuals through the use of their strength, are not usually included in the category of pests.
 Duty-free shopping offers an opportunity to purchase, in certain places, products free of customs duties and excise taxes.
 Travellers visiting countries with high taxation can sometimes save a significant amount of money, particularly on goods such as spirits and tobacco.
 On the Buffalo-Pittsburgh Turnpike, the stretch between Point Marion and Fairmont is the most challenging driving conditions and often travels remote and lonely terrain.
 If you do not usually drive on rural roads, stay alert: there are many steep slopes, narrow lanes and sharp bends.
 The speed limits are notoriously lower than in the previous and following stretches, usually from 35 to 40 mph (56-64 km/h), and their strict compliance is even more important than in any other section.
 Curiously, however, the cell phone signal is much better here than in many other sections of the road like Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastry is of good quality and, in Bavaria, cakes are quite tasty and varied, similar to those prepared in Austria, its southern neighbor.
 Fruit cakes are common, with apples baked inside throughout the year and cherries and plums appearing in the summer.
 Many of the German baked goods also have almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts. In general, the popular pastries make an excellent combination with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you fancy small but tasty cakes, try the Berliner, also called Pfannkuchen or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 Curry is a recipe based on herbs and spices and served with meat or vegetables.
 We can find curry «dry» and «wet», depending on the volume of liquid.
 In the villages of the interior of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is often used in curry. In southern India and other coastal areas of the subcontinent, coconut milk is common.
 With 17,000 islands to choose from, Indonesian cuisine is a generic term that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines that are distributed throughout the country.
 However, used without any other qualification, the term tends to refer to the cuisine originating from the central and eastern regions of the main island of Java.
 The Javanese cuisine, now available throughout the archipelago, offers a variety of dishes seasoned with simple condiments, with predominance of the favorite aromas of the Javanese, such as peanuts, chili, sugar (especially Javanese coconut) and various aromatic spices.
 The stirrups are the supports for the feet of the riders that hang on both sides of the saddle.
 While they provide more stability for the rider, they can present safety issues, as it is possible for their feet to get caught in them.
 If a rider is thrown from a horse but has one foot caught in the stirrup, he can be dragged if the animal runs away. To reduce the risk, a series of safety precautions exist.
 First, most riders wear riding boots with a heel that has a flat and fairly narrow sole.
 In addition, there are saddles, especially English ones, with safety bars that allow the stirrup leather to detach from its structure if a rider who is thrown out pulls back.
 The Cochamó Valley is the most popular climbing destination in Chile and is known as the Yosemite of South America, with a variety of extensive granite walls and cliffs.
 The summits also offer stunning views from the peaks. Climbers from all corners of the globe constantly delineate new paths between their walls of infinite potential.
 Downhill snow sports, such as skiing and snowboarding, are popular disciplines that consist of sliding on skis or a board attached to the feet, over snowy terrain.
 Skiing is a major travel activity with many devotees, sometimes called "ski bums", who organize their vacations entirely around skiing at a specific location.
 The idea of skiing is very old, as there are cave paintings that represent skiers and that date back to around 5,000 BC.
 As a discipline, alpine skiing dates from no later than the 17th century. In 1861, Norwegians inaugurated the first recreational ski club in Australia.
 Ski touring: also known as backcountry skiing, touring or ski mountaineering.
 While linked, in general it does not involve practicing backcountry skiing or alpine-style mountaineering, developed on steep slopes and with much stiffer skis and footwear.
 Imagine the ski slope as a hiking trail.
 Under good conditions, you will be able to cover a little more distance than if you were walking, but you will rarely reach the speed of cross-country skiing without a heavy pack on groomed trails.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries. Under normal circumstances, travelling through several countries would mean having to deal with visa applications and passport controls several times.
 However, the Schengen area functions as a single country in this regard.
 Generally, when you move within this region you can cross borders without passing through a passport control again.
 In the same way, having a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for permits for each of the member countries of this space separately, which will save you time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal criterion to determine when a manufactured item can be considered an antique. Some tax agencies have established that objects over 100 years old are antiques.
 The definition varies geographically, where the age limit could be more narrowly defined in places like North America than in Europe.
 It may happen that products made by hand are classified as antiques, even though they are newer than similar mass-produced goods.
 Reindeer husbandry is a vital livelihood among the Sami and the culture related to this commercial activity is important for many engaged in other professions.
 Even so, even traditionally, not all the Lapps have been engaged in reindeer husbandry on a large scale, but have lived from fishing, hunting and other similar activities, using reindeer mainly as draft animals.
 Today, many Lapp people work in modern commercial activities. Tourism is an important source of income in Lapland, the Sámi region.
 Although it is used extensively, especially among non-Roma, the term Gypsy is often given a pejorative connotation, as it is associated with negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions about Roma.
 If your destination country is subject to a travel alert, it could affect your medical or trip cancellation insurance.
 You may want to consult the recommendations of other governments, but they are designed for their own citizens.
 For example, a North American visitor in the Middle East might face different situations than a European or an Arab.
 Travel warnings are just a concise summary of the political situation in another country.
 The views presented are usually superficial, generic and too simplistic compared to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 The term severe weather generally refers to any hazardous weather event that is capable of causing damage, serious social disruption, or death.
 Severe weather can occur anywhere on the planet and there are different types depending on geography, topography and atmospheric conditions.
 Hurricanes, dust storms, excessive rainfall and forest fires are types and consequences of extreme weather, as are lightning storms, tornadoes, water spouts or cyclones.
 Among the extreme regional and seasonal weather phenomena are dust, snow, and ice storms.
 Travellers are strongly advised to research any extreme weather risks in the area they are visiting, as this may affect their travel plans.
 Anyone planning a trip to a country that could be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 It is likely that by searching for "Hostile Zone Course" on the Internet you will find the address of a local company.
 Usually, a course will cover all the topics that have been discussed here in much more detail and, in general, with practical experience.
 A course usually lasts between 2 and 5 days, and includes role-playing games, first aid, and sometimes even weapons training.
 Books and magazines about survival in the wild are common, but publications about war zones are scarce.
 Passengers who are scheduled for sex-change surgery in another country should make sure they have valid documentation for the return trip.
 The position of governments regarding the possibility of issuing passports without gender declaration (X) or updated documents in order to match the name of the person with the gender with which he/she feels identified is varied.
 The willingness of foreign governments to honor these documents varies widely.
 Security checks at airports have become more invasive since September 11.
 Transgender people who have not yet had surgery should not have to expect to pass through scanners with their dignity and privacy intact.
 The return currents are the flow that recedes from the waves breaking on the shore, often on a reef or similar.
 Because of the submarine topography, the return flow gathers in certain areas of greater depth and there it can originate a fast current with direction to deep waters.
 Most deaths occur because of the fatigue caused by trying to swim against the current, which may be impossible.
 Once you escape the current, swimming back will not be more complex than usual.
 Make an attempt to get somewhere where you can't get back or, if you have the skills and someone has seen you, it might be wise to wait for rescue.
 The impact of returning home occurs before the cultural (there is no period of happiness of "honeymoon"), takes longer to go away and can be more difficult.
 Travelers who have easily adapted to a new culture sometimes have great difficulty in returning to their native culture.
 When he returns home after living abroad, he will have adapted to that new culture and will have lost some of the habits of his native culture.
 When you traveled abroad for the first time, people were probably patient and understanding, because they knew that travelers need to adjust to a new country.
 People may not realize that tolerance and understanding are also needed for returning travelers in their homes.
 The pyramid light and sound show is one of the most interesting things for children in the area.
 In the dark, you can see the pyramids and contemplate them in silence before the show begins.
 You will generally hear the sound of tourists and vendors at all times. The history of sound and light is like a fairy tale.
 The sphinx appears as a background scene and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are projected on the pyramids and all of them are illuminated.
 The discovery of the South Shetland Islands occurred in 1819 and several nations claim them. They have the largest number of bases, reaching sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago is 120 km north of the mainland. The largest island is King George, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 Others include Livingston Island and Deception, where there is a spectacular natural harbour formed by the flooded caldera of an active volcano.
 Ellsworth Land, whose boundaries are defined by the Bellingshausen Sea, is a region located south of the peninsula.
 Here, the mountains of the Peninsula mix with the plateau and then rise again to form the 360 km long Ellsworth Mountains, divided into two by the Minnesota Glacier.
 In the northern sector, Sentinel Range, are the highest peaks of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, with a summit at 4892 meters on Mount Vinson.
 In remote areas, where cell phone coverage is not available, a satellite phone could be your only option.
 A satellite phone cannot be compared to a mobile phone, because to make a call, you must be outdoors and have a clear line of sight to the satellite.
 The service is commonly used in waterborne transportation, including recreational vessels, as well as for expeditions requiring remote data and voice.
 You can check with your local telephone service provider for more information on how to sign up for this service.
 Combining travel and learning has become a very popular option for those planning to take a sabbatical year.
 This is very popular among high school graduates, as it allows them to take a gap year before university without jeopardizing their education.
 In many cases, enrolling in a study program abroad for a year sabbatical can, in fact, increase the chances of accessing higher education once you return to your home country.
 Usually, a tuition fee will be charged to enroll in these educational programs.
 Finland is an excellent destination for sailing: the "land of a thousand lakes" also has thousands of islands, both in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 A yacht is not always necessary in the archipelagos and lakes.
 While the coastal archipelagos and the larger lakes are large enough for any yacht, smaller craft or even a kayak offer a different experience.
 Boating is a national recreational activity in Finland, with one boat for every seven or eight inhabitants.
 The same is true in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but, taking that out, it is quite unique (e.g., in the Netherlands the ratio is one in forty).
 Most of the exclusive cruises that are made through the Baltic Sea include a long stay in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that you have the possibility of making a visit to the historic city for a few days during your return trip, sleeping on the boat overnight.
 If you only disembark during excursions on board, you do not need a separate visa (since 2009).
 In the brochures of some cruises, Berlin, Germany is mentioned. However, as can be seen in the map above, the city is not near the sea and its visit is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Flying can be scary for people of any age and place, particularly if they have never been through the experience or if they have lived through a traumatic situation.
 There is no shame in this: it is no different from other types of fears and personal discomforts that afflict so many others.
 For some, understanding a little about how planes operate and what happens during a flight can help to overcome a fear that stems from a lack of knowledge or a sense of not being in control.
 Courier companies are paid very well to make fast deliveries. Often, time is very important when it comes to business documents, merchandise, or urgent repairs.
 Large companies have their own planes on some routes, but there was a problem for smaller companies and other routes.
 If they shipped by air freight, on some routes it may have taken days to unload and clear customs.
 The only option to do it faster was to send it as checked baggage. Airline regulations prohibit transporting luggage without a passenger, and this is where you come in.
 The obvious way to travel first class or business class on an airplane is to spend a fortune on that privilege (or, better yet, have your company pay for you).
 But there is a price to pay: in general, you can pay up to four times more for the economy fare in business class and up to eleven times more in first class.
 It is usually a waste of time to look for discounts for first class or business class seats on direct flights.
 Airlines are well aware that there is a basic group of travelers who are willing to pay a lot of money for the privilege of getting somewhere quickly and comfortably, and charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chişinău. Its regional language is Romanian, although Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a republic composed of many ethnic groups, among which have arisen conflicts of that kind.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the formation of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria, east of Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but which no UN member state recognizes.
 Despite the failure of political negotiations, economic ties between the two parts of Moldova have been re-established.
 Orthodox Christianity is the majority religion in Moldova.
 Izmir is the third most important city in Turkey, with approximately 3.7 million inhabitants, the second largest port after Istanbul and a very good transport hub.
 What was once the ancient city of Smyrna is now a modern, evolved and busy metropolis, established around a wide bay and surrounded by mountains.
 Both the wide boulevards and the cutting-edge shopping malls are dotted with traditional red-tiled roofs, from the 18th-century marketplace and the old mosques and churches. Yet the atmosphere is more Mediterranean Europe than traditional Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvík has excursions to the nearby island of Eysturoy and has an atypical octagonal church.
 In the cemetery, there are interesting sculptures of doves in marble on some tombs.
 It is worth spending half an hour to take a walk around the fascinating village.
 To the north and within easy reach is the romantic and stunning city of Sintra, which gained popularity among foreigners due to a vivid account of its splendours by Lord Byron.
 In Scotturb, bus 403 runs regularly to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Also, you should visit, to the north, the great Sanctuary of Our Lady of Fatima (Santuário) which is a place where there were apparitions of the Virgin Mary, famous all over the world.
 Don't forget that, basically, you are visiting a place that served as a mass grave and that is also a site of almost invaluable significance to a significant part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women alive who survived their stay in this place and many more who had loved ones who were murdered or worked there until their death, both Jewish and non-Jewish.
 Give the place all the dignity, solemnity and respect it deserves. Don't joke about the Holocaust or Nazism.
 Do not ruin the place by making marks or graffiti on the structures.
 Catalan and Spanish are the official languages of Barcelona. About half of the people prefer to speak Catalan, most understand it and almost everyone knows Spanish.
 However, since Catalan is legally the first official language, most of the signs are written only in that language.
 Still, Spanish is also widely used in public transportation and other buildings.
 While the usual announcements in the Metro are only displayed in Catalan, unscheduled interruptions are made in a wide variety of languages through an automatic program in a wide variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians have a reputation for being self-centered, rude, and arrogant.
 Although it is often just an inaccurate stereotype, the best way to have a good time in Paris is to behave as well as possible, like a well-bred person. This will make moving around there much easier.
 A few gestures of courtesy on your part will quickly dispel the apparent brusqueness of the Parisians.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is very wooded, with mainly beech, fir and pine trees, and has a mixed alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 It has a wide and extraordinary range of vegetation communities, thanks to the variety of microclimates, soils and altitude levels.
 This region is also home to a wide variety of animal and bird species.
 The European brown bear, the wolf, the eagle, the owl, the lynx, the wild cat and the capercaillie, are some of the exotic animals, among many other ordinary creatures, that can be found in the place.
 During visits to monasteries, women must wear skirts that cover their knees and cannot wear their shoulders uncovered.
 While almost all monasteries give robes to women who arrive unprepared, if you bring your own, especially if it is brightly colored, the monk or nun will smile at you at the entrance.
 Following the same line, men are required to wear pants that cover their knees.
 This can also be borrowed from the clothes available when entering, but that clothing is not washed after each person who uses it, so it might not feel comfortable wearing these skirts. A one-size-fits-all for all men!
 The cuisine of Majorca, like that of other similar regions of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork), and uses olive oil in all its recipes.
 Pa amb Oli is a popular and simple meal, typical in summer. It is bread with olive oil, tomato and any other ingredient such as cheese or tuna, among others.
 All nouns, as well as the word Sie for 'you', always carry their initial capital letter, even if they are located in the middle of the sentence.
 It is a key method for differentiating between certain verbs and objects.
 It can also be said that it simplifies reading, although its writing is somewhat complex, since it is necessary to find out if a verb or adjective is used in a substantivated form.
 Speaking Italian is relatively easy, since most of its words sound the same as they are written.
 The c and the g are the letters with which you should be more attentive, since they are pronounced differently depending on the vowel that follows them.
 Also, be sure to respect the difference in pronunciation between r and rr. For example, caro means expensive, while carro means car.
 Persian has a relatively simple and mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this grammar book will help you learn a lot about Persian grammar rules and achieve a better understanding of the sentences.
 Needless to say, if you speak any Romance language, it will be easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 However, those who speak some Spanish may reach the hasty conclusion that Portuguese is quite similar and that it is unnecessary to study it individually.
 Nowadays, pre-modern observatories have generally become obsolete and remain in operation as museums or educational destinations.
 Since, in its heyday, light pollution was not a problem of great magnitude as it is today, it is common to find them in cities or on campuses, being of easier access than those that are built in modern times.
 Most of today's research telescopes consist of immense structures installed in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The contemplation of cherry blossoms, called hanami, is traditional in Japan since the 8th century.
 The concept came from China, where the plum flower was the most appreciated.
 It was the emperor of Japan who organized the first celebrations of the cherry blossoms, only for him and other members of the aristocracy of the Imperial Court.
 Plants look better when they are in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to take "just one" specimen.
 If you collect "specimens" during a visit to a formally organized garden, you will be asked to leave, without discussion.
 Generally, Singapore is a very safe place to be and very easy to get around; plus, you can buy almost any product from your arrival.
 But because of its location in the "high tropics," a few degrees north of the equator, you will always have to deal with heat and, when the sky is clear, strong sun, which happens less often.
 Some buses also go to Hebron, in the north, which is the site where, according to the Bible, the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac and Jacob and their wives were buried.
 You must check that the bus you are getting on is going to Hebron and not just to Kiryat Arba, which is a Jewish neighborhood near there.
 Inland waterways can be a good topic for holidays.
 For example, visiting castles in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, taking a cruise to interesting destinations on the Danube, or cruising the Erie Canal.
 They also delineate routes for popular hiking and cycling trails.
 For the Christian religion, Christmas is one of its most important festivities, in which the birth of Jesus Christ is celebrated.
 There are many traditions related to this holiday that have also been incorporated by non-believers from both Christian and non-Christian countries around the globe.
 It is a tradition to spend Easter night on a boat to watch the sunrise.
 There are, of course, Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it may well be a pre-Christian ritual of spring and fertility.
 More traditional churches often offer a Paschal Vigil on Saturday night during the Easter weekend, and congregations usually begin celebrating the resurrection of Christ as soon as midnight arrives.
 All animals that originally arrived on the islands came to this place by swimming, flying or floating.
 Because they are so far from the mainland, mammals could not reach them, which made the giant tortoise the main grazing creature in the Galápagos.
 Many mammal species have been introduced to the Galapagos since man arrived on the archipelago, such as, for example, the caprine, equine and bovine livestock, or the rodents, dogs and felines.
 If you travel to the Arctic or Antarctic regions in winter, you will experience the polar night, which means that the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 Since the sky will remain dark for most of the day, it is a great opportunity to see the Northern Lights.
 Thanks to the low population that resides in these regions and that, as a result, there are no problems of light pollution, you can also enjoy the stars.
 In Japan, the work culture has a more vertical and formal structure than what Westerners are used to.
 The typical dress of the business world is suits and coats and co-workers are addressed by their last names or by their job titles.
 Harmony in the workplace is key, where group efforts are emphasized over individual praise for achievements.
 Workers often need approval from their superiors to make decisions and are expected to follow their instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.31997733292003383, 'precisions': [0.6339448150394178, 0.3843607125965631, 0.2536535303776683, 0.1696076751756039], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.0672707414748595, 'translation_length': 26384, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 61.15126209084229, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8730532221289963, 'scores': [0.8693832755088806, 0.8653597235679626, 0.9211978316307068, 0.8076028227806091, 0.9002019762992859, 0.7656779885292053, 0.9117256999015808, 0.8541635274887085, 0.8853505253791809, 0.9187645316123962, 0.8690059185028076, 0.8809741139411926, 0.8396783471107483, 0.8851678371429443, 0.901863157749176, 0.8084328174591064, 0.8947228789329529, 0.9318839907646179, 0.924593985080719, 0.8411126136779785, 0.9298853278160095, 0.9554428458213806, 0.8737348914146423, 0.8510293364524841, 0.8793025016784668, 0.9253502488136292, 0.8514029383659363, 0.8538289070129395, 0.8209395408630371, 0.8784177899360657, 0.8243275284767151, 0.8132883906364441, 0.8198232054710388, 0.8837568163871765, 0.9069862365722656, 0.8801332116127014, 0.8956473469734192, 0.8908888697624207, 0.86838299036026, 0.8821989297866821, 0.8634163737297058, 0.9475993514060974, 0.9154859185218811, 0.9083349108695984, 0.852636992931366, 0.910982608795166, 0.8852503299713135, 0.9202994704246521, 0.921725332736969, 0.8804451823234558, 0.9220816493034363, 0.9283871054649353, 0.9051126837730408, 0.9240342974662781, 0.8673927187919617, 0.8423426747322083, 0.8521845936775208, 0.8830896019935608, 0.8821846842765808, 0.9209535717964172, 0.7986922860145569, 0.9014632105827332, 0.8179126381874084, 0.9117903113365173, 0.8943914771080017, 0.8850210309028625, 0.8768845796585083, 0.8088147640228271, 0.9296579360961914, 0.8871164917945862, 0.8721641898155212, 0.8377633690834045, 0.834547221660614, 0.8546045422554016, 0.8818462491035461, 0.8461765646934509, 0.9009575843811035, 0.8650199770927429, 0.9433329701423645, 0.9279106855392456, 0.8047145009040833, 0.7810925841331482, 0.8676887154579163, 0.8244288563728333, 0.8484700322151184, 0.8405178785324097, 0.8434926867485046, 0.8934435248374939, 0.8735660314559937, 0.8543792366981506, 0.8588073253631592, 0.8469461798667908, 0.8747767806053162, 0.881986677646637, 0.8973138928413391, 0.937906801700592, 0.71322101354599, 0.8689367175102234, 0.8843574523925781, 0.8733198046684265, 0.8983314037322998, 0.8851901292800903, 0.8992853760719299, 0.9106355309486389, 0.8627663254737854, 0.8791159987449646, 0.8380477428436279, 0.869103729724884, 0.8532884120941162, 0.8474780917167664, 0.942417323589325, 0.9637795090675354, 0.9447541832923889, 0.9282985329627991, 0.8761003613471985, 0.8442630171775818, 0.8525583744049072, 0.8941274285316467, 0.8610710501670837, 0.9003123641014099, 0.7803522944450378, 0.8392857909202576, 0.9159858822822571, 0.8855581879615784, 0.9099094867706299, 0.919064462184906, 0.8594063520431519, 0.9122720956802368, 0.8296898007392883, 0.8664979338645935, 0.796730637550354, 0.8429141640663147, 0.8873459696769714, 0.8828975558280945, 0.8484539985656738, 0.8942440152168274, 0.8823743462562561, 0.9054030776023865, 0.9341221451759338, 0.8387982845306396, 0.8447779417037964, 0.8503057360649109, 0.929930567741394, 0.8706815242767334, 0.9059808850288391, 0.8494108319282532, 0.907227635383606, 0.9438532590866089, 0.9130988121032715, 0.9038731455802917, 0.8580107688903809, 0.9023591876029968, 0.8460463881492615, 0.8147051334381104, 0.8384297490119934, 0.9172446131706238, 0.864767849445343, 0.7885923981666565, 0.8848023414611816, 0.9108180999755859, 0.8554969429969788, 0.8503646850585938, 0.8689573407173157, 0.8520485758781433, 0.9220338463783264, 0.7690179944038391, 0.8630203604698181, 0.8821500539779663, 0.8171718716621399, 0.9037318825721741, 0.8761739134788513, 0.883541464805603, 0.9257053732872009, 0.8964042663574219, 0.9183527231216431, 0.9054329991340637, 0.8632752299308777, 0.9339531064033508, 0.8633325695991516, 0.9416188597679138, 0.8650017380714417, 0.9608839750289917, 0.9094504117965698, 0.9087331891059875, 0.84881591796875, 0.9002711176872253, 0.9246061444282532, 0.8391659259796143, 0.8918823599815369, 0.8156043887138367, 0.8758065104484558, 0.8455217480659485, 0.8397987484931946, 0.877637505531311, 0.9557511210441589, 0.9213495254516602, 0.8739106059074402, 0.8437274098396301, 0.8523128032684326, 0.8740678429603577, 0.8332859873771667, 0.8507838249206543, 0.8358954787254333, 0.8068321943283081, 0.8751911520957947, 0.863647997379303, 0.8923019170761108, 0.8459870219230652, 0.9081903100013733, 0.9353339672088623, 0.9276637434959412, 0.907267153263092, 0.9042036533355713, 0.8574414253234863, 0.9460816979408264, 0.9281579256057739, 0.8996105790138245, 0.8963495492935181, 0.8779793977737427, 0.8985128998756409, 0.8951236605644226, 0.8948888182640076, 0.9100774526596069, 0.8988689184188843, 0.9277014136314392, 0.8830162882804871, 0.8259105086326599, 0.6483363509178162, 0.8915571570396423, 0.8788372874259949, 0.9631425142288208, 0.8984361290931702, 0.8720929622650146, 0.8967812061309814, 0.8286461234092712, 0.8869908452033997, 0.8786655068397522, 0.7975318431854248, 0.9339466691017151, 0.8679518699645996, 0.8067380785942078, 0.8362061381340027, 0.8642033338546753, 0.8475715517997742, 0.8563901782035828, 0.9078957438468933, 0.8677133321762085, 0.837279736995697, 0.8567109704017639, 0.9202991724014282, 0.8941321969032288, 0.9172168374061584, 0.9227489829063416, 0.8972331881523132, 0.8826813697814941, 0.8784354329109192, 0.9113696813583374, 0.9166030287742615, 0.8668054938316345, 0.8722688555717468, 0.8880864977836609, 0.7045745253562927, 0.8527511358261108, 0.9162182211875916, 0.8837265372276306, 0.8847479820251465, 0.8560972809791565, 0.9067948460578918, 0.9010843634605408, 0.792327344417572, 0.8877755999565125, 0.831395149230957, 0.9006696343421936, 0.7829708456993103, 0.7421994805335999, 0.8050316572189331, 0.7148365378379822, 0.9092170596122742, 0.8484024405479431, 0.8115628361701965, 0.9001925587654114, 0.8957838416099548, 0.9321029782295227, 0.8994755148887634, 0.890826404094696, 0.9316417574882507, 0.8764049410820007, 0.8747015595436096, 0.9146861433982849, 0.8884204030036926, 0.8801377415657043, 0.8515239953994751, 0.8811011910438538, 0.8965091109275818, 0.8455811738967896, 0.8711499571800232, 0.8096522092819214, 0.8539519906044006, 0.803255021572113, 0.8854878544807434, 0.8834876418113708, 0.8688316941261292, 0.8512032628059387, 0.8970465064048767, 0.9359462857246399, 0.872110903263092, 0.8681825399398804, 0.8454988598823547, 0.8968710899353027, 0.8836554288864136, 0.889890730381012, 0.9430528283119202, 0.8968862891197205, 0.752224862575531, 0.9384180307388306, 0.9189091324806213, 0.8588738441467285, 0.8877679109573364, 0.8559353947639465, 0.8295861482620239, 0.7799262404441833, 0.6745778918266296, 0.8785877823829651, 0.8850600719451904, 0.8071289658546448, 0.8231983184814453, 0.8777205348014832, 0.8713335394859314, 0.911547839641571, 0.8504031896591187, 0.8967625498771667, 0.8330787420272827, 0.8818206191062927, 0.9138527512550354, 0.9565678834915161, 0.848002016544342, 0.8954119086265564, 0.7689037919044495, 0.839552104473114, 0.8920677900314331, 0.8568928241729736, 0.7476912140846252, 0.8365667462348938, 0.8684976696968079, 0.9303440451622009, 0.898983895778656, 0.9079245924949646, 0.8474969267845154, 0.8917041420936584, 0.8553194403648376, 0.9005773663520813, 0.8692653775215149, 0.8602913022041321, 0.9265804886817932, 0.9277530312538147, 0.8958184719085693, 0.8925972580909729, 0.8540922999382019, 0.8286184668540955, 0.8022093176841736, 0.7972633242607117, 0.8937499523162842, 0.9104523062705994, 0.8139258027076721, 0.9209403395652771, 0.7981870174407959, 0.8092667460441589, 0.8782556056976318, 0.777682363986969, 0.8394926190376282, 0.847869873046875, 0.8089895844459534, 0.8785838484764099, 0.902888834476471, 0.8993970155715942, 0.8451398015022278, 0.9180245995521545, 0.9201673269271851, 0.8455876708030701, 0.8888713717460632, 0.908510148525238, 0.85991370677948, 0.7553793787956238, 0.7462475299835205, 0.8547286987304688, 0.8710131645202637, 0.7295778393745422, 0.8576222658157349, 0.8765576481819153, 0.9202064871788025, 0.8789706230163574, 0.9272531867027283, 0.9218162894248962, 0.9253801703453064, 0.9149685502052307, 0.8332130908966064, 0.8139007687568665, 0.9742352366447449, 0.7867404818534851, 0.8826122879981995, 0.9153661131858826, 0.8978803753852844, 0.8698922395706177, 0.8685876727104187, 0.8511776924133301, 0.9263404011726379, 0.8571199774742126, 0.8778942823410034, 0.8469188213348389, 0.9269400238990784, 0.8699419498443604, 0.8214213252067566, 0.8596820831298828, 0.8949396014213562, 0.9038463234901428, 0.8616005182266235, 0.8917528390884399, 0.8252605199813843, 0.9091213941574097, 0.8670461773872375, 0.8878288865089417, 0.8985519409179688, 0.9081010222434998, 0.8385903239250183, 0.8482597470283508, 0.915648341178894, 0.898830235004425, 0.894603431224823, 0.8722342848777771, 0.9474077820777893, 0.8982276320457458, 0.7954747676849365, 0.8765278458595276, 0.8479557633399963, 0.8234925866127014, 0.8365514874458313, 0.877081036567688, 0.9135979413986206, 0.8796417117118835, 0.885853111743927, 0.9042372107505798, 0.8464508652687073, 0.9372633099555969, 0.8754367828369141, 0.8334135413169861, 0.8656367659568787, 0.9213181138038635, 0.9020931124687195, 0.9299265146255493, 0.8718363046646118, 0.9048933982849121, 0.8662781119346619, 0.9086855053901672, 0.8734606504440308, 0.8855035901069641, 0.8356994390487671, 0.8508283495903015, 0.8941916823387146, 0.8775420784950256, 0.8680071830749512, 0.8778993487358093, 0.8682553172111511, 0.8993841409683228, 0.8931910395622253, 0.8805184364318848, 0.8745405077934265, 0.8217870593070984, 0.8482847809791565, 0.8406939506530762, 0.8321962356567383, 0.8579714298248291, 0.8007550239562988, 0.8818210959434509, 0.8218030333518982, 0.8062891364097595, 0.8428896069526672, 0.8659663796424866, 0.8719429969787598, 0.8911411762237549, 0.921719491481781, 0.9360855221748352, 0.8401998281478882, 0.9020475745201111, 0.8640926480293274, 0.9070680141448975, 0.8922096490859985, 0.8591064214706421, 0.8824891448020935, 0.8831908702850342, 0.9220656752586365, 0.8766534924507141, 0.8549503087997437, 0.9284233450889587, 0.9021579027175903, 0.8106325268745422, 0.8782091736793518, 0.8893839120864868, 0.9085191488265991, 0.9042109251022339, 0.8775808215141296, 0.9121020436286926, 0.9301546216011047, 0.8896821141242981, 0.8586669564247131, 0.8519230484962463, 0.891182541847229, 0.8875012397766113, 0.869057834148407, 0.8881151676177979, 0.8867241144180298, 0.7481868863105774, 0.7919327616691589, 0.9183997511863708, 0.8807855248451233, 0.8860928416252136, 0.9158613085746765, 0.845304548740387, 0.8576325178146362, 0.8681240677833557, 0.9271551370620728, 0.8894349932670593, 0.8232129812240601, 0.8638803362846375, 0.8810887336730957, 0.9194815754890442, 0.8758857846260071, 0.8574203848838806, 0.7707746624946594, 0.8668442368507385, 0.8923565745353699, 0.8718835711479187, 0.8878991007804871, 0.8735552430152893, 0.8752626180648804, 0.8211283087730408, 0.5183892250061035, 0.834420382976532, 0.8712250590324402, 0.8932297229766846, 0.9081315398216248, 0.8692551851272583, 0.8561378717422485, 0.8922106623649597, 0.8770511746406555, 0.8750529885292053, 0.9304441213607788, 0.9101343154907227, 0.893290102481842, 0.8610164523124695, 0.9222341179847717, 0.8292055726051331, 0.9089779257774353, 0.8851856589317322, 0.8757709264755249, 0.922768235206604, 0.8012322783470154, 0.8748884797096252, 0.8682261109352112, 0.8366143107414246, 0.8028504848480225, 0.9065266251564026, 0.9058332443237305, 0.8622332811355591, 0.8912301063537598, 0.8770280480384827, 0.9013996720314026, 0.8116793036460876, 0.8963883519172668, 0.8608943223953247, 0.8395540714263916, 0.8839402794837952, 0.9099234938621521, 0.7905006408691406, 0.8670293092727661, 0.9237834215164185, 0.8654002547264099, 0.8766003847122192, 0.870491087436676, 0.9240464568138123, 0.905707061290741, 0.875728189945221, 0.9389764070510864, 0.8335047364234924, 0.8527674674987793, 0.7741883397102356, 0.8838930726051331, 0.8018503785133362, 0.9002593159675598, 0.8440430760383606, 0.9195064902305603, 0.9057785868644714, 0.8938784599304199, 0.8189573884010315, 0.8634482622146606, 0.8575669527053833, 0.8797898888587952, 0.8782827258110046, 0.9038298726081848, 0.835536539554596, 0.878767192363739, 0.8655207753181458, 0.861188530921936, 0.8969142436981201, 0.9267751574516296, 0.9181934595108032, 0.9071581959724426, 0.8151558637619019, 0.8469454050064087, 0.8376824855804443, 0.8666808605194092, 0.8979943990707397, 0.9242845177650452, 0.9010853171348572, 0.8934898972511292, 0.8247964978218079, 0.8832327127456665, 0.9071410298347473, 0.899500846862793, 0.8705230355262756, 0.8602600693702698, 0.9311445355415344, 0.7055256962776184, 0.8964415788650513, 0.8756349682807922, 0.7954403758049011, 0.9067429304122925, 0.8860072493553162, 0.9176436066627502, 0.9296172857284546, 0.8754740953445435, 0.8493222594261169, 0.8861172795295715, 0.8711720705032349, 0.8772085309028625, 0.9440826773643494, 0.9124852418899536, 0.9099284410476685, 0.8573691248893738, 0.9176707863807678, 0.8823511600494385, 0.874930739402771, 0.9376621842384338, 0.8380503058433533, 0.7734856009483337, 0.8520073294639587, 0.7926105856895447, 0.8575937151908875, 0.8853093385696411, 0.8217461705207825, 0.8969081044197083, 0.9225387573242188, 0.9135267734527588, 0.8573182225227356, 0.8582649827003479, 0.8945755362510681, 0.9170306921005249, 0.9015465974807739, 0.8574807047843933, 0.8786018490791321, 0.8486837148666382, 0.8289158940315247, 0.9026991724967957, 0.836368978023529, 0.8782769441604614, 0.9296886324882507, 0.8668220639228821, 0.8812143802642822, 0.899300217628479, 0.8486053347587585, 0.908048152923584, 0.8777938485145569, 0.9335440993309021, 0.9225074648857117, 0.8737631440162659, 0.891434371471405, 0.8970156311988831, 0.8791860342025757, 0.904309093952179, 0.8850762844085693, 0.9416904449462891, 0.8679234981536865, 0.9496464133262634, 0.885921835899353, 0.8913524746894836, 0.8666261434555054, 0.9260475039482117, 0.8913596272468567, 0.9088689088821411, 0.9225496649742126, 0.8811411261558533, 0.9201253652572632, 0.8606910109519958, 0.9045896530151367, 0.8515946865081787, 0.8654034733772278, 0.9458842277526855, 0.8668281435966492, 0.857915997505188, 0.8729589581489563, 0.9254112243652344, 0.8490849137306213, 0.8490827083587646, 0.910682737827301, 0.8458190560340881, 0.8436373472213745, 0.8966313600540161, 0.8351592421531677, 0.8632408976554871, 0.916373610496521, 0.8560629487037659, 0.9017718434333801, 0.8064973950386047, 0.9055378437042236, 0.8867644667625427, 0.8556113243103027, 0.8437994122505188, 0.8338878750801086, 0.8174456357955933, 0.8971943259239197, 0.9030009508132935, 0.7430900931358337, 0.8895386457443237, 0.8939611315727234, 0.9171593189239502, 0.9093015789985657, 0.921967089176178, 0.8891992568969727, 0.8383398056030273, 0.7406030893325806, 0.8908511400222778, 0.8120688796043396, 0.8999968767166138, 0.8842893242835999, 0.9182409048080444, 0.8214501142501831, 0.8949560523033142, 0.910300076007843, 0.8844569325447083, 0.8980217576026917, 0.8267896771430969, 0.7739084362983704, 0.8592962622642517, 0.8734866976737976, 0.8702474236488342, 0.8663156032562256, 0.8877713680267334, 0.8914769291877747, 0.8896864652633667, 0.9200341105461121, 0.8971437811851501, 0.9237778782844543, 0.9252756834030151, 0.88165682554245, 0.8745806217193604, 0.8570470213890076, 0.834133505821228, 0.8675066232681274, 0.8761894106864929, 0.8298335671424866, 0.8508979678153992, 0.9313040375709534, 0.9200382232666016, 0.9546303153038025, 0.8658360242843628, 0.8873099684715271, 0.8877425789833069, 0.8943745493888855, 0.8619222044944763, 0.9113239645957947, 0.9593293070793152, 0.8763236403465271, 0.8730384111404419, 0.8299516439437866, 0.8806482553482056, 0.8940134644508362, 0.8540679216384888, 0.755557656288147, 0.8158677220344543, 0.8698683381080627, 0.7823324799537659, 0.895588219165802, 0.8611759543418884, 0.9296939969062805, 0.879900336265564, 0.8998036980628967, 0.7579904794692993, 0.9062100052833557, 0.859733521938324, 0.8984363079071045, 0.8984388709068298, 0.931725800037384, 0.9011120796203613, 0.8952208757400513, 0.8989343047142029, 0.875812828540802, 0.8132135272026062, 0.966712474822998, 0.8415717482566833, 0.8406947255134583, 0.8860129117965698, 0.8727574944496155, 0.7692937254905701, 0.910172164440155, 0.7899590134620667, 0.8271133899688721, 0.8880810141563416, 0.9090412855148315, 0.9246557950973511, 0.9033281207084656, 0.8967006802558899, 0.8652875423431396, 0.8701658248901367, 0.8856512904167175, 0.8940830826759338, 0.905423641204834, 0.8432136178016663, 0.8212812542915344, 0.8450937867164612, 0.7653906345367432, 0.8835877776145935, 0.9389044046401978, 0.8824923634529114, 0.8613516092300415, 0.8379166126251221, 0.9070067405700684, 0.8766269087791443, 0.8869351148605347, 0.906607985496521, 0.8560276627540588, 0.8691746592521667, 0.8602712750434875, 0.874950647354126, 0.8745700716972351, 0.8446628451347351, 0.8813828229904175, 0.8751888871192932, 0.8834790587425232, 0.8427298665046692, 0.8624366521835327, 0.9118764996528625, 0.885693371295929, 0.8388836979866028, 0.8343381285667419, 0.8726097941398621, 0.8494250178337097, 0.8779957890510559, 0.7259041666984558, 0.8793890476226807, 0.7954621911048889, 0.886344313621521, 0.9101657271385193, 0.8989750742912292, 0.8953081965446472, 0.8434909582138062, 0.796203076839447, 0.7844840288162231, 0.8551587462425232, 0.9282602071762085, 0.9083678126335144, 0.8962615132331848, 0.8644745349884033, 0.9111079573631287, 0.9131317734718323, 0.8842574954032898, 0.8643432259559631, 0.8498635292053223, 0.8286663889884949, 0.8650715351104736, 0.8904221057891846, 0.8697771430015564, 0.8978545069694519, 0.8697575926780701, 0.9256464242935181, 0.9022627472877502, 0.9164217710494995, 0.8732784986495972, 0.8608124256134033, 0.8732333779335022, 0.9669846296310425, 0.8145747780799866, 0.8809964060783386, 0.9099582433700562, 0.9255627989768982, 0.8805965185165405, 0.7877224087715149, 0.9152029752731323, 0.8393117785453796, 0.8572224974632263, 0.8270506858825684, 0.8474107980728149, 0.9020602107048035, 0.8390440344810486, 0.759440004825592, 0.702497661113739, 0.8866784572601318, 0.8630983233451843, 0.9062507748603821, 0.8396936058998108, 0.9467992782592773, 0.9025447964668274, 0.848173975944519, 0.8838565349578857, 0.8513273596763611, 0.890892505645752, 0.8955814838409424, 0.8863317370414734, 0.867626965045929, 0.866998016834259, 0.8582600951194763, 0.9408506751060486, 0.8809741139411926, 0.8262494802474976, 0.8923738598823547, 0.8577616214752197, 0.8792433738708496, 0.8352083563804626, 0.9349513649940491, 0.892676830291748, 0.8865813612937927, 0.9068395495414734, 0.9094030261039734, 0.8476765751838684, 0.8814312815666199, 0.8042813539505005, 0.8540535569190979, 0.8717116713523865, 0.8458338975906372, 0.8212850689888, 0.9006330370903015, 0.8828758597373962, 0.8993068337440491, 0.9015352725982666, 0.8533248901367188, 0.8844296932220459, 0.7890412211418152, 0.8329979777336121, 0.8934431076049805, 0.933986246585846, 0.8363685011863708, 0.9077920317649841, 0.9206586480140686, 0.9482494592666626, 0.9255717396736145, 0.8963168263435364, 0.8087896108627319, 0.8287140727043152, 0.8748512864112854, 0.9095528721809387, 0.8873129487037659, 0.9075242280960083, 0.7946010828018188, 0.8457432985305786, 0.8636091351509094, 0.9197610020637512, 0.8678162693977356, 0.9238253235816956, 0.8754903078079224, 0.8721465468406677, 0.814365565776825, 0.9376564621925354, 0.7688261270523071, 0.7997645735740662, 0.9140704274177551, 0.9004889130592346, 0.9532248973846436, 0.8227458596229553, 0.8609632253646851, 0.8120156526565552, 0.907653272151947, 0.7598714232444763, 0.8992934226989746, 0.8507348299026489, 0.795791745185852, 0.9112843871116638, 0.852708101272583, 0.8354860544204712, 0.8195428848266602, 0.8454846143722534, 0.9564781188964844, 0.873065173625946, 0.8840100765228271, 0.8615480065345764, 0.9175131916999817, 0.832601010799408, 0.90999835729599, 0.8422768712043762, 0.8712285161018372, 0.8555108904838562, 0.8548786640167236, 0.8165555596351624, 0.897346556186676, 0.8711499571800232, 0.8722795844078064, 0.8587287664413452, 0.8698529601097107, 0.8947440385818481, 0.9492504596710205, 0.9001504182815552, 0.8782760500907898, 0.7729390859603882, 0.9290298819541931, 0.8658862113952637, 0.9257742762565613, 0.8067758679389954, 0.7872259616851807, 0.9229355454444885, 0.8219828009605408, 0.8430066704750061, 0.9119907021522522, 0.8437299132347107, 0.9091499447822571, 0.8988509178161621]}